%
“A battle is but one part of a larger whole. Any student of
war will tell you that a wise commander will not commit
to battle unless he has first ensured that it is a fight he
cannot lose. But this still gives the battle an importance it
does not warrant. Fighting a battle, even a battle you
cannot fail to win, is the purest foolishness unless it
advances the chances of ending the need for any further
battles. Your primary aim must always be to win the war,
not win the battle.”
                                             Imperium Tactica
%
A spiritu dominatus,
Domine, libera nos.

From the lightning and the tempest,
Our Emperor, deliver us.

From plague, deceit, temptation and
war,
Our Emperor, deliver us.

From the scourge of the Kraken, 
Our Emperor, deliver us.

From the blasphemy of the Fallen,
Our Emperor, deliver us.

From the begetting of Daemons,
Our Emperor, deliver us.

From the curse of the Mutant,
Our Emperor, deliver us.

A morte perpetua,
Domine, libera nos.

That thou wouldst bring them,
only death,

That thou shouldst spare none,

That thou shouldst pardon none,

We beseech thee, destroy them.


-Invocation of the Fede Imperialis.
Commonly known as the battle-prayer
           of the Adepta Sororitas.
%
Abrom clutched the worn, metal
casing of the autogun closer to
his chest as the first missiles began
to fall. All around him the other
members of the coven hunched into
the rubble and whispered prayers to
the Patterner, He Who Wields Fate.
The barrage thundered closer and
they chanted louder and more
fervently, to drown out the shrieks
of those blown apart by that deadly
hail.

Ahash vri Arvad Abi-ba’al Aduni-
ba’al, Sapari ba’al…

Abrom could not understand why
they were suffering so. Had not the
Servant of the Patterner promised
that its awesome powers would
drive back the denizens of the False
Emperor? Had it not sworn that
the uprising would be an
unstoppable force, a swinging
hammer which would smash apart
the shackles of the Dead Emperor
which bound them into slavery? If
this pounding continued there would
be no one left alive to liberate.

As if in answer to Abrom’s prayers,
the explosions abruptly ceased.
Stones and shrapnel thrown up by
the bombardment hissed to the
ground for a second ot two before
an eerie silence fell. Abrom
cautiously peered out of his hiding
place and into the clouds of smoke
drifting over the ruins of the
settlement. There! A flash of red in
the haze, and another! Giant, red-
armoured figures stalked forward
across the shattered landscape like
primordial beasts.

Abrom felt a shudder down his
spine - the blood suckers were here,
sniffing out survivors to rip apart
with their bare hands and drain
their blood. Abrom gripped his
autogun more tightly as their leader,
Boreaus the Demagogue, gestured
his surviving companions forward.
They all knew they could expect no
mercy from the blood suckers, and
less from the Servant of the
Patterner if they lost faith now.

Merkin was blown
apart by an explosive
bolt as soon as he
stood up to shoot.
Then Jaynak and Veril,
and three others who
Abrom didn’t know
suffered the same fate.

Malakur was lucky and
only had his arm blown off, but
his screaming ceased in seconds as
his life-blood gushed out onto the
dusty rubble.

Abrom and the others were
splattered with blood and viscera
and flying stone fragments as more
bolts roared across the position.
Abrom felt the urge to run (if only
he could make his legs break the
shackles of fear which bound them).
Boreaus tried to rally them, chanting
the prayer the Servant had taught
them until his voice was cracked
and hoarse.

Budi-ba’al, Ba’al-iashupu, Ba’al
maluku!

As Boreaus chanted, Abrom felt a
tingling thrill through him, a
change seemed to be taking place.
Boreaus’ words became shrieks as
his spine twisted back and limbs
splayed apart. Blue fire spilled from
his jaws as they stretched out to an
impossible length. His skin split as
something far too big unfolded
itself from within him. Scintillating
feathered wings shook themselves
outward, glittering like jewels as the
Servant of the Patterner raised its
slender body up to twice man-
height. Abrom averted his gaze and
grovelled as its ancient, inhuman
eyes swept over the coven and out
to where the blood suckers
approached, unflinching as a storm
of bolter fire roared past. It spoke
with a rich, melodious voice.

“Come childrennn, your time is
nigh…”

With a beat of its mighty pinions,
the awesome presence was gone.
Abrom and the others surged
forward after it, their terrified
voices howling a song of praise to
the Lord of Change.
%
All Daemons are
Falsehood. They are
Lies, given the
shape of creatures
by the Power of
Chaos. Fear the
Daemons of Khorne
for this reason and
then fear them
once more.
%
“And so our time in Vogen dragged on, the days blurring into one long continuous battle, the only respite being a few
moments of fitful sleep snatched when we could. But even here the horror could intrude in the form of nightmares that,
if anything, seemed more real than the horror which induced them. The battle for the city simply went on and on, an
interminable assault on the senses, until you felt that all you had ever known was war and death…”

                                                                        Veteran Sergeant Hessel, 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
%
And what are the achievements of
your fragile Imperium? It is a corpse
rotting slowly from within while
maggots writhe in its belly. It was
built with the toil of heroes and
giants, and now it is inhabited by
frightened weaklings to whom the
glories of those times are halt-
forgotten legends. I have forgotten
nothing, and my wisdom has expanded
far beyond mere mortal frailties.

       - Ahriman of the Thousand Sons
%
Another explosion rocked the building, sending a shower of grey
dust from the ceiling, but Sergeant Marnok of the 122ⁿᵈ Cadians
barely noticed. His cheeks were sunken and his eyes ringed with
black circles. The sergeant gripped the stock of his lasgun and
tried to get some rest but, no matter how hard he tried, he
couldn’t quite block out the rumbling sound of a city at war. The
crash of artillery vied with the roaring of distant flames and
moans of the wounded. His squad had been stuck here for two
days now, trapped in this shattered building, forced to wait for
armoured support before they could advance any further into
Vogen.

Marnok could recall very little of the last few days, just nightmare
memories of bloody hand-to-hand combat and mad scrambles
from ruined buildings along rubble-choked streets. He’d lost
count of the number of times they’d stormed fortified enemy
positions through minefields, razor wire and lethal volleys of
gunfire grenades. An assault that had started nearly five
thousand strong had been reduced to less than eight hundred
men. Somehow he’d managed to avoid being killed and Marnok
prayed the Emperor that his luck would hold true throughout
this hellish warzone. He glanced around the room they now
sheltered in, at the haggard Guardsmen that had survived this
long. A coating of mud and dust rendered the men of his squad
an anonymous grey. Only Jenks looked different and that was
only because he was bloody from the belly down. He’d taken a
sniper’s bolter round in the gut when they holed up in here and
died screaming as his blood flooded into a huge pool on the floor.
They’d propped him by the window and used his corpse to try
and flush out the sniper by watching for muzzle flashes but,
wherever he was, he’d not been fooled. Jenks was proving to be
as useless in death as he’d been in life.

He risked a glance through the barricade pushed over the
entrance at the building’s rear as he heard the squeal of iron tank
tracks and pushed himself upright with a groan. Two Leman
Russ battle tanks idled behind the building, their engines
rumbling throatily as a mud-caked liutenant sprinted, bent over,
towards them. Marnok limped towards the barricade and, on his
way past, rapped his knuckles on Jenks’ helmet. He paused and
said “Come on soldiers, look alive.”

A few chuckles greeted the off-repeated joke, but most of the
men were too exhausted to bother. It had become a kind of
ritual amongst the squad to repeat the joke like a mantra to
ward off Jenks’ bad luck. Marnok partially dismantled the
barricade to allow the liutenant to enter the room. The
officer’s eyes scanned the guardsmen, finally settling on
Marnok. He removed his helmet and ran a hand through
sweat-streaked hair, mopping his brow with a tattered
bandanna.

“I’d put that helmet back on, sir,” advised Marnok, “Lot of
sniper activity round here.”

“Oh, yes. Of course,” replied the liutenant sheepishly.
“Are you Sergeant Marnok?”

Marnok nodded as the officer continued, “Liutenant
Badenhall, I have orders for you …”

                            ***

The two Leman Russ tanks rumbled slowly down what
had once been a prosperous mercantile district. Glass,
concrete and twisted girders lined the smoke-filled
streets and Marnok could see they were less than a
hundred metres from their objective. Badenhall
called it Building 235 which, in Marnok’s opinion,
didn’t sound like something worth dying for. Yet
that was almost a certainty, he glumly realised.

Suddenly a trio of missiles speared from the building, trailing
bright contrails and impacting on the tank’s turret with an
almighty clang. The missiles corkscrewed wildly away from the
tank, exploding high above it and Marnok smiled grimy as he
realised the traitors had made a fatal error. They’d obviously
been waiting for the tanks to close to ensure their weapons hit,
but now the range was too short and the missiles’ war-spirits
didn’t have time to arm themselves.

The tanks ground to a halt, their turrets tracking round to where
the missiles had come from, and fired their mighty battle cannons
in unison. The noise was deafening and the ground shook with
the vibration of their firing. The massive sheels blasted the
building’s facade off, smoke boiling from its interior and jagged
chunks of masonry cascading from its frontage. Marnok was
gratified to see a host of mangled bodies amongst the rubble.
Liutenant Badenhall drew his chainsword and shouted to the
assembled guardsmen, “For the Emperor! Charge!”

Marnok sprinted after the liutenant shaking his head. The damn
fool was going to get himself killed like that. He bellowed his own
cry, terror and anger lending his legs strength as he ran, firing
from the hip. Small arms fire pattered harmlessly from the
armour of the tanks and bursts amongst the men of Marnok’s
squad. Trautman went down and half a dozen others whose
names he didn’t know. More were cut down before they finally
reached the building and Marnok slammed his back into the
building’s wall, his heart pounding like a jack-hammer. He
snapped a couple of frags from his belt and hurled them through
the giant hole the tanks had blasted. The grenades detonated
with teeth-loosening force, smoke and screams issuing from
within.

Marnok hurled himself into the building, snapping shots left and
right. Badenhall followed him, firing his laspistol and waving his
sword like a madman. Two bloodied rebels appeared from the
smoke, dazed and blackened. Marnok didn’t give them the
chance to recover and cut them down with two swift shots. More
troopers poured inside and Marnok knew they had to keep
moving. A single grenade in their midst could end this assault
before it began. He thundered his foot into a door and dived
through, rolling to a firing crouch and drawing his sword
and pistol. He shot the rebel defence trooper before him
in the facem swaying aside as another swung his rifle butt
at his head. Marnok kicked him in the groin and slashed
his sword across his throat. He roared with unfettered
fury, a release of pent up aggression and continued
the slaughter…

                         ***

For another two bloody hours, the Cadians rampaged
through Building 235, fighting and killing with desperate
savagery. As the last squad reported their sector clear,
Marnok slid down against a wall, dropping his pistol and
sword from bruised hands. He felt utterly drained. He bled
from a score of wounds and only now did he feel the pain of
his injuries. The frenetic, heart-pounding danger of the battle
was over and a mix of emotions bubbled up within him, hate,
fear, elation and sadness. Less than a quarter of the men
had survived the assault, but Building 235 was theirs.
Marnok just hoped it was worth it. He saw Badenhall
marching towards him, his eyes aflame and Marnok
knew that the liutenant must have fresh orders
for him. Marnok closed his eyes as he realised
that this day’s butchery was not yet over.
%
“Any Cadian who can’t field-strip his
own lasgun by age ten was born on
the wrong planet.”

                                 Anon
%
“Armageddon… a world whose name has become a byword
for war and destruction…”

                      Lord Commander Solar Eugenian
%
“As a silvered moon is concealed by cloud, so we bide
our time. And when our face is revealed, our enemies
turn and flee before the harbingers of their doom.”

                            Sarithel Jhelisdai of the
                            Moonstrike Shadow Walkers
%
As Private Wylie waited for his loader to choose the next target, he was
startled to find a target choose them. At the edge of the ruins in front of them,
a massive winged Chaos Marine rose from a crouch to his full height and
turned to face them. Wylie heard his loader swear under his breath. Standing
at least a foot taller than any of them, the Chaos Marine lifted his arms out to
either side offering himself as a target, and he heard a voice of velvet edged
with steel speak to him.

“Am I not a heretic? Punish me in the name of your false Emperor,
but beware, for death and I are old friends.”

Wylie heard his loader yelling, “Fire, fire, fire,” and
saw his squad mates’ lasgun fire explode across the
traitor’s armour before he fired his missile launcher.
Miraculously, one of the lasgun bolts found a
weakness in the giant’s kneepad and he tumbled
to one side just a Wylie’s krak missile slashed
through the space he had been standing in.
Wylie felt physically sick. He heard the
rich laughter of his enemy
coming closer, but
didn’t look up. He
knew full well what
was coming.
%
“Ask not the Eldar a question, for they will give you three
answers, all of which are true and horrifying to know.”

                                        – Inquisitor Czevak
%
At the end of the 41ˢᵗ millennium the runic readings of the Farseers were
brimming with dire portents. Eldrad Ulthran’s worst suspicions were
confirmed when Maugan Ra strode through the Craftworld’s main webway
portal, accompanied by a massive bodyguard of Dark Reapers. The presence
of the Phoenix Lord on Ulthwé affirmed the fact that the Craftworld was
in great peril. Before the hour was out, the Seer Council and Maugan Ra
began a council of war.

Behind the closed doors of the Spirit Chambers, the Farseers vainly probed
the skeins of probability for a safe path through the coming storm. The
sheer scale of the coming conflict was terrifying: the forces of the Mon-
keigh and the minions of Chaos outnumbered the Eldar by millions to one.
There was only one way Eldrad could feasibly alter the course of fate in so
many theatres of such an apocalyptic war.

Whilst the Avatar of Ulthwé was awoken and the Spear of Khaine
assembled to march with him to war. Eldrad fragmented his consciousness,
storing a piece of his psyche in hundreds of sacred Waystones. Maugan
Ra assembled the Black Guardians of Ulthwé, dividing them into small
Strike Forces capable of travelling the convoluted labyrinth of the webway.
With the leader of each detachment carrying a sacred Waystone. Eldrad
could disperse his consciousness across the entire sector, guiding each
Strike Force through the webway to the heart of each battle at exactly
the right time and location. Maugan Ra’s Dark Reaper bodyguard added
to the strength of the Black Guardians in each Strike Force, and every
member of the Craftworld who could don the mask of the Warlock did
so to better lead their brethren.

When the storm broke, Ulthwé was ready to strike like the lightning.
%
Brother Sergeant Egil of the Space Wolves
ducked behind the smoking, burnt out shell of
a Land Raider and slammed a fresh magazine
into his bolter. The remains of his Blood Claw
pack were spread throughout the blasted
building, gore streaked and exhausted. Even with
the filtering effect of his armour’s auto senses,
the noise of the battle was still deafening. He
risked a glance around the side of the Land
Raider. Thick clouds of choking black ash fell
from a lacerated sky, and the entire city was
aflame. Massive explosions and the thunder of
artillery obscured the battle and rendered even
his acute senses useless. Egil spun round, raising
his bolter to a firing position as he heard the
crunch of heavy footsteps approaching behind
him. The massive Terminator armoured form of
Brother Kaarlson of the Wolf Guard entered
the building and Egil lowered his gun.

“Ready your men, sergeant. We take the fight to
the traitors.” snarled the Wolf Guard. Even over
the vox-com’s distortion and din of battle, the
edge of feral anticipation in Kaarlson’s voice was
unmistakable. Egil nodded, passing the word to
his men. The green runes on his visor display
blinked as the Space Wolves acknowledged his
orders. Egil racked the slide on his bolter as
the ground suddenly shook under a thunderous
impact. The deep, rumbling crash sounded again,
like an angry god’s footsteps, and Egil looked
up as a massive shadow swallowed them.
Emerging from the smoke, like a vast beast
from the sagas, a Night Gaunt Titan towered
above them, its dark carapace silhouetted against
the bloody sky.

Lights flared around the Titan’s head as Imperial
fire impacted on its void shields, but the
enormous machine ignored them, lifting one
huge leg ponderously from the ground. Egil
could clearly hear the whine of its powerful
actuators over the explosions. The gigantic war
machine’s foot smashed aside buildings in its
path and Egil realised with sick horror exactly
where it would stamp down.

“Everybody up! Move!” he yelled and fired his
jump pack as the shadow of the Titan’s foot
descended upon them. Egil powered through the
air, heedless of the crack of small arms fire
that burst around him, angling for the cover of
a shattered bunker. He landed badly and cursed
as he fell in the rubble, looking back to see
Kaarlson slowly lumbering though the ruins.
He screamed his name as the mass of the
Titan’s foot smashed through the building and
crashed down upon the Wolf Guard Terminator.
Egil covered his head as the Titan’s other foot
swept above him, showering dust and debris.
Howling with rage, he fired his bolter
ineffectually at the Titan as it strode onwards,
unheeding of the great warrior it had just
killed.

Egil again reloaded his weapon, his thoughts
filled with avenging the fallen Kaarlson. He
looked over towards the flattened building and
watched with astonishment as the rubble began
to shift and heave. Massive chunks of plascrete
and steel were pushed aside as Kaarlson pulled
himself free of the debris. His Terminator
armour had been gashed open in a dozen
different places and his blood was splashed
crimson against its grey, but he was alive.

The Wolf Guard Terminator joined Egil in the
ruins of the bunker and shouted. “Like I said,
Sergeant. Ready your men. We’ve wasted enough
time already. We have a battle to win!”
%
BURNING DEATH SPEED FREEKS
Below was some sort of Humie supply
dump, with stacks of crates and barrels,
and Imperial Guardsmen scuttling around
dousing fires. Skargrim grinned and
sounded the Waaagh-horn before kicking
his driver to go faster. Around him, the
massed vehicles of the Speed Kult raced
down towards the shocked Humies at full
throttle. Warbuggies vied with bikes and
T raks to cover the ground the fastest,
Trukks packed with Boyz careened against
each other as they fought to get ahead,
the greenskins’ shouts inaudible over the
thunder of engines. The column of
ramshackle, bellowing vehicles snaked and
twisted like a living thing as it converged
on its prey.
%
Captain Invictus was the
head of the Ultramarines
1ˢᵗ Company when it
was destroyed defending the
polar fortresses in the Battle of
Macragge during the first
Tyrannic War. Invictus had honed
the Company carefully after the
losses of the Corinthian Crusade,
gradually expanding it with
stolid veterans drawn from the
rest of the Chapter in accordance
with the edicts of the sacred
Codex Astartes. As such it
suffered none of the failings of
many reformed Companies; squad
cooperation was flawless and fire
discipline superb. Invictus was
fanatically committed to ensuring
that his battle brothers deserved
the respect they gained from the
rest of the Chapter and drove
them with relentless energy.
Invictus also acted as Regent of
Ultramar, and oversaw much of
the rulership of Macragge itself
when the Master of the
Ultramarines was busy with
other duties.

As such it was he who
requested that the 1ˢᵗ Company
be assigned to protecting the
two polar fortresses, the vital
lynchpins in Macragge’s orbital
defence network. He judged,
rightly as it transpired, that the
Tyranids would attempt to make
landings at these places to
neutralise the defences, opening
the door for untold numbers of
the creatures to swarm down and
infest the planet. The presence of
the elite veterans of the 1ˢᵗ
Company ensured that the
Tyranids suffered unsustainable
casualties overrunning the
fortresses, delaying the inevitable
for long enough that Calgar and
the rest of the Chapter could
forge a victory in space. Captain
Invictus’ body was discovered
among those of the last stand of
the 1ˢᵗ Company in Silo 8 of
the northern fortress. It is said
that the bodies of their enemies
stretched six deep for twenty
yards all about them, and every
pace from the silo to the
entrance four levels above.
%
Chaplain Cassius is
amongst the oldest
members of the
Ultramarines Chapter,
discounting those who fight on
with the blessing of internment
within Dreadnought armour.
Although close on four centuries
old, his eye remains sharp and
his aim steady, and his sturdy
presence within the Ultramarines
battle lines fills the hearts of
his younger brethren with pride.
Cassius can recall tales of the
first Tyranic war when he
fought alongside Marneus Calgar,
always “young Calgar” to
Cassius, to purge Ultramar of
the horrific denizens of
Hivefleet Behemoth. His
impassioned words have carried
the Ultramarines forward into
battle on a thousand worlds,
firing them with his own
deeply-held passion and belief.
%
++ Commander. they beg for mercy -
++ Mercy! Oh Lord Khorne, truly have you led us
   to a land overflowing with blood and skulls! Give
   them the mercy of death.
++ Affirm. Blood! Blood! Blood! for my Lord!
++ Chosen of Khorne. lead us in the final assault!
++ Blood for the Blood God! Suppressing fire.
   Forward and centre. Heavy Bolters range 250.
   Move scum…

Communications intercept ends. The Portrein defenders
are assumed to have detonated their armoury.

                        - Ordo Malleus Secret Report:
                             Portrein Raid 106960.M41
%
Corporal Deakins gripped the stock of his lasgun and tried in vain to
stop himself from being jolted against the interior of the Chimera
armoured troop carrier. The transport bounced over another ridge of
frozen ground, sending his helmeted head slamming into a metal
stanchion. He swore and cursed the driver of the transport. Rivers of
melted snow pooled around his combat boots, sloshing about as the
squad was carried across the hard packed ground. He looked around
the compartment at the excited faces of 2ⁿᵈ Squad as they fired the
hull lasguns. Sergeant Kobal was sitting at the back of the Chimera,
seemingly untroubled by the jarring ride. His eyes were half shut,
headphones pressed to his hear as he concentrated on hearing the vox-
chatter over the deafening howl of the Chimera’s powerful engine.

“Right lads!” bellowed Kobal, his voice easily cutting through the
engine noise. “On your feet and get ready for disembarkation!”

Deakins could hear the engine noise deepen and the storm bolter open
fire as the Chimera slowed to a speed that would allow them to
safely dismount. With a squeal of hydraulics, the Chimera’s back ramp
began to drop. By the Emperor he was looking forward to this! He
could feel his heart rate thud like a trip-hammer, his earlier
discomfort and annoyance fading as he saw dozens of Chimera behind
theirs slowing and deploying from column into line.

“Go! Go! Go!” shouted Kobal even before the ramp was fully lowered.
As one, the ten man squad pounded down the ramp, jumping to the
muddy snow that formed their wake. Quickly looking around he could
see thousands of other troops pouring from their transports and a
fierce pride swelled in his breast.
%
Corpses bloated with noxious gases spewed
excremental fluids as the filth encrusted
Land Raider crushed them beneath its rusted
iron tracks, grinding their jellied bones to
pulp. Explosions burst around the massive
vehicle, filling the air with lethal fragments
and scoring the necrotic surface of its
armoured hide. Hulking and deformed
warriors kept pace with the plague tank, firing
mucus covered bolters through the yellow fog
as they advanced. The Imperial Fists defensive
line was less than fifty metres away, the
ground before it littered with the twisted,
plague-ridden carcasses of those unfortunate
enough to have been touched by the dark
powers.

The fog coiled about the Land Raider like a
living thing, as though it moved on some vile
business of its own. The white heat of
lascannon fire speared through the sickly haze
and struck the hull of the tank, blasting a
deep wound in its fleshy exterior. The
massive vehicle slewed around, but kept
moving, spinning tracks churning scraps of
rotten flesh and decayed limbs as it rumbled
over the pathetic barricade their foes had
erected. The ground shook as the vehicle
crashed back to earth. The front ramp
dropped and pestilential fumes gusted from
within, like the breath of some vast, infected
beast. Vomited from the belly of the
armoured beast, warriors spawned in a
festering nightmare charged from the Land
Raider, a foul miasma of contagion wreathing
their helmets in smoky darkness. Almost
three metres tall, the huge figures wore
poisonous green suits of Terminator armour,
splashed with clusters of weeping boils and
sores. Diseased lesions and foul organic matter
oozed from cracks in the armour, the stench
of the plague Terminators causing even the
defending Space Marines to gag through their
re-breather equipment.

Captain Learchus of the Imperial Fists
levelled his bolter at the hideous giants before
him, scarce able to believe that he would once
have called these abominations brothers. Their
souls were forfeit to the dark gods and their
inner corruption was manifest in their
hideousness. Hatred like nothing he had
known before coursed through his veins like
an electric charge as he emptied his magazine
into the traitors. His squad followed
his example, firing without pause into
the charging Terminators. Several shells found
homes in traitor flesh, blasting chunks
of diseased tissue and ceramite clear, but
not a single Terminator fell, the decaying
armour and unnatural resilience of the
followers of Nurgle carrying them through
the hail of fire.

                *     *     *

Brother Colathrax stalked leisurely through
the fog of sweet corruption and hail of bolter
shells, his plague sword licking out left and
right. He cut and stabbed, slicing skin and
pricking organs, but never killing outright; no,
never that. For who was he to deprive his foes
of the agonising bliss of Father’s Nurgle Rot?
How sweet it was to watch those whom the
false Emperor had made mighty descend into
madness and decay, their once powerful
bodies turning on them as plague reduced
them to mindless, gibbering horrors of
mutated flesh. They had set themselves up as
gods and would now pay the price for that
arrogance. A Space Marine Captain in blazing
yellow armour stood before him, his sword
raised in challenge and Colathrax smiled.

“Time to die, traitor!” hissed Captain
Learchus.
Colathrax chuckled, “I think not.” and swung
his dripping sword at his opponent. Learchus
ducked and thrust with his own weapon. The
energised edge scraped a furrow in the
Terminator’s armour, but slid clear. Colathrax
batted aside his opponent’s blade with his
power fist, stabbing his suppurating weapon
through Learchus’ belly. The blade of the
plague sword skewered the Space Marine in
an upward arc, lifting him from his feet and
hammering through the building behind.

Learchus hung suspended above the ground,
blood pooling beneath his twitching body.
The wound refused to close and Learchus
coughed bloody phlegm as he felt the meat
of his body rotting at a terrifying rate,
internal organs flooding with dead fluids and
the flesh of his limbs sloughing from his
bones inside his armour. His breath rasped as
his lungs dissolved and his vision faded as his
eyeballs liquefied, sliding down his face like
glutinous tears. He tried to curse his killer,
nut his throat had ruptured and seconds later
his brain was a foetid grey ooze dribbling
from his sagging head.

Brother Colathrax inhaled the intoxicating
aroma of his master’s putrescent benediction
and offered a short prayer to Father Nurgle.
He wrenched his sword from the wall,
allowing the sloshing suit of power armour to
topple to the stinking ground. The
disintegration of this world was almost
complete and Colathrax could taste their
victory on the foul wind that swept the
battlefield. He pictured oceans of decaying
flesh, infection rampant and plagues
unnumbered. That would be their gift to the
denizens of this mortal realm.

Colathrax laughed at the thought as the fog
closed in.
%
+++Director, Division Ocular - EYES ONLY

The following are my personal comments to your Lordship only, Overall, while the sheer zeal of this new cult can feel disturbing at first, I
see little cause for worry. As noted above, they have high marks from the regional governor of their originating province - several of the
higher ranking officials are openly strong members of the cult, but continue of course to be loyal to your Lordship. Their basic tenets do
not conflict with the Imperial Creed, though several members of the Ministorum locally have differing opinions on that matter as I’m sure
your Lordship is aware.

This ‘Brotherhood of the Faithful’ preach honest toil, respect for elders, humility, and self-reliance. I was allowed to visit one of their
countryside retreats, and observed the membership in action. All were very properly subservient to me as a recognised agent of your
Lordship, and no attempt was made to hide or conceal anything. I also viewed several church services, and while there were not enough
specific praises to the Emperor of Man for my personal tastes, their more general call to serve the ‘All-Father’ were plentiful and
enthusiastic. When queried, I was told this was the overall name they used in their faith for the Emperor or even your Lordship. They feel
strongly in following the single leading figure in the culture evidently.

Many of the ranking officials wanted to press upon their dedication to your Lordship; I got the feeling they were worried they might be
targeted as heretics. During my meeting with Brother Barantom the young leader of the movement (see transcript above), I got the same
feeling, but more of a confident tone of the fundamental and righteous nature of his faith. Very well spoken, as well as strongly
charismatic fellow. This undercurrent of absolute and utter conviction is one of the things that has made this group grow so well in my
opinion. As noted above, it started out some years ago as an odd cult of re-birth and renewal though faith, represented by the ‘snake
swallowing its own tail’ symbol. [Again, I’m still not sure exactly how long ago; some archived records we have contains clues indicating
this could be an offshoot of an even older religious following dating back several decades at least] Some of the older members still cling to
those older beliefs I would imagine, but has done much better since moving towards a more mainstream belief system.

Quite honestly, I think the main reason the Ministorum is so upset with this group is that they are simply becoming too popular, especially
in the more remote areas away from the capitol. Since they follow the Imperial Creed, they cannot launch an overt attack on the group
though. Thus my official recommendation for continued intensive monitoring and possible infiltration, so we can keep them satisfied by
appearing to be closely watching the situation. But privately, I would recommend your Lordship not waste any more resources than the
bare minimum. This ‘Brotherhood’ is just a passing fancy of the masses, and will fade on its own soon enough with time.

                                                                                                                                       Tokkra
%
“Diverse and many-fold weaponry is of the
greatest importance for the steel-clad
behemoth, lest it shall be confronted by
foes it cannot master. On the field of war,
it may battle Orks without number, against
whom the burning lance of the lascannon is
worthless. On another world, the armoured
abominations of the alien Eldar may be
found, against whom the noble bolter is
useless.

The commander must maintain the watchful
gaze of the eagle to seek his foes through
scope and slit. Once found, they must be
crushed with the full weight of fire before
seeking the next enemy, for the beast
which is merely maimed may strike back…
still. When a suitable target is found, the
machine must be halted for most
efficacious execution: for motion and
accuracy are anathema to one another.
Speed has its place, just as firepower has
its own. Never forget this!”

        Extract from ‘Commander of Armour’s
             First Book of Indoctrinations’
%
“Do not throw your forces blindly into battle. Before
committing your forces, examine the situation. Review
your own strength, and that of your enemy. Remember
your own objectives, and try to anticipate those of your
opponent. Then select those of your troops best suited to
the task in hand.”

                                         Imperium Tactica
%
“Ere we go, ere we go, ere we go…”
%
’Ere we go, ’ere we go, ’ere we go… Bloody hell, where’d dose
beaky wagonz come from? Quick ladz, face dis way. No, no,
no! Not dat way, dis way. Oi! Where are yooz boyz running off
too? Come back ’ere ya yoosless lot… Bugga! Oh well, I guess
I’ll just have to take out dem wagonz meself. ’Ere we go den…
WAAAAAARGH!!!

                               Last words of Warlord Naz-bakk
%
Every segmentum, indeed almost every
sector of the Imperium, has a Cypher
legend, some of them dating back
thousands of years, and the number of
bounties offered for his capture would
buy a subsector were anyone able to
collect them. It is clear that the
popularity of Cypher legends is tied to
nonconformists throughout the Imperium.
Self-deluded radicals believe that
Imperial institutions attempt to repress
individuality and, in a perverse reaction,
subconsciously approve of the maverick
mystery man.

Cypher has become an iconic figure in
the minds of these neurotic radicals. He
is hooded, clearly implying that he is an
outlaw who wishes to avoid recognition,
a pointless gesture because everyone
clearly does recognize him! In fact, most
sightings are only the result of an
imaginative observer conferring Cypher’s
identity on some unknown man. Anyone
who foments rebellion and defies capture
can become Cypher in the popular
imagination. Tales commonly emphasize
Cypher’s prodigious skill with pistols:
normally he is portrayed firing both a
plasma pistol and a bolt pistol with
unerring accuracy. This technique is
normally associated with hive gangers,
particularly outlaws of the sort that
attract a mystique similar to that of
Cypher. Such “sightings” are clearly a
product of uncontrolled wish fulfillment
rather than accurate observation. Finally
and most perplexing are the frequent
references to the sword that Cypher
carries. There are no credible examples
of the sword being drawn. However, the
rumour most commonly heard is that the
sword is broken and is somehow
connected to the early history of the
Dark Angels. The link with the Dark
Angels is a difficult one to prove, as
they are among the most secretive of
the Adeptus Astartes. It is known that
the Dark Angels and their successor
Chapters sometimes refer to themselves
collectively as the Unforgiven and are
frequently seen hunting down renegade
and traitor Space Marines with or
without official sanction. It is assumed
by some, therefore, that Cypher is a
former Dark Angel and that his sword
may be one of their sacred relics. This
is pure supposition and an insult to the
reputation of the Emperor’s most
devoted warriors.

 From The Heresy of Cognitive Dissonance,
             by Cardinal Elyass Vallkante
%
Follow me, my Children, and the glory of victory shall
be yours. We shall cleanse ourselves in the crimson
waters of the enemy. We shall bring the ecstacy of
quick release to those who stand before us. We shall
give bloody praise to the Lord of Pleasure and sing
his name as we dance across the fallen. Follow me,
my Children, and you shall taste the undreamt joys
that lie beyond the bounds of mortal sense.

                 - Fabius Bile, Liutenant Commander of
                                the Emperor’s Children
%
Follow me, my children, and the
glory of victory shall be yours.
We shall cleanse ourselves in the
crimson waters of the enemy. We
shall bring the ecstasy of quick
release to those who stand before
us. We shall give bloody praise to
the Lord of Pleasure and sing his
name as we dance across the
fallen. Follow me my children,
and you shall taste the undreamt
joys that lie beyond the bounds
of mortal sense.

                       Fabius Bile
%
“For every battle honour, a thousand heroes die alone,
unsung, and unremembered.”
%
“For seven terrible years the Siege regiments of the
Imperial Guard carried out their onerous duty,
manning the hundreds of miles of trenches and fortified
positions that served to contain the arch-heretic’s
forces. Success was measured in yards of ground
gained, and every inch of that deadly ground was
bought with the blood and lives of men.”


                       From the official history of the
                        Kaiserschlect campaign, M41.745
%
From: Apothecary Beacher XVIII

To: Chapter Commander Maticula

Subject: Plasma burns running
rampant

Though for the day: We shine His
light upon the heathens, for the
darkness hates the light.

Dear sir,

As I passed Honored Brother Cales
through the Apothecarium once more, I
finally have reached the point where I can
hold my tongue no longer. I had thought
that the extensive scoring of his armor
had come from battle, which is true, but
from the enemy fire, which is not. In fact,
the majority of the damage he has taken
has been self-inflicted! I have asked the
others of our Brothers who are given the
sacred position of Honored Plasma
Gunner, and each has shared with me the
knowledge that they wound themselves
more often than they are wounded by
enemy fire. Indeed, they report fully 16%
misfires, with a third of those being so
fierce as to take them out of action, if not
be slain outright.

This is unacceptable.

Further review of this situation lays the
blame squarely upon the Chaplains, not
Techmarines. For, while the weapons
remain well-blessed and in the highest
working order, Honorable Plasma
Gunners are trained only in the Litany of
Righteous Indignation, which, as you
know, calls for cleansing the foe without
though of self-preservation, as opposed
to the less severe Litany of the Controlled
Strike, which leads to firing with only the
exact force needed, so that His Word and
our ammunition need not see waste.
Obviously, replacing one Litany with the
other would result in an unfair reduction
of the honor of the position, thus I think
that both should be taught, leaving to the
Honored Brother the choice of which to
bless his weapon with for each firing.
Instructing them to save the Litany of
Righteous Indignation for only the hardest
of targets would reduce our losses by an
estimate seven Honored Brothers a
year, without appreciable loss of
firepower.

Your in eternal service

Apothecary Beacher XVIII

‘We whose hands bring peace as well as
war.’
%
GIVE THE SQUIDDIES NO QUARTER.
ISSUED: General Kojhmar, Strategic Command
%
"How like a God He is, that ancient Machine, primal of all His Kind, the Imperator! His mighty Fists,
massive like two Towers of Destruction, laden with the Doom of Mankind’s bitter Foes."
%
“How much like a god he is, that ancient machine, primal of all his kind! His mighty fists, massive like two towers of
destruction, laden with the doom of mankind’s bitter foes. He watches over us now as battle joins, and in his shadow
we shall advance upon our enemies and defeat them.”
%
“Hurl forth your holy shells upon
the foe. Let them tear the enemy
asunder and spill their blood!
BLOOD for Lord Khorne!!
BLOOD FOR THE BLOOD GOD!!!”

- Doomblaster Incantation of Destruction.
%
“I know not if he represents the
greatest threat or greatest hope for the
future of the Imperium. I only pray
we stop him before we find out.”

                Inquisitor Bastalek Grim
%
“I remember the first day we entered Vogen. The city had already been blasted by our artillery and IN 'Bolts [Imperial
Navy Thunderbolts] and not one building was left fully standing. Rubble choked the streets, which meant that us
footsloggers got to go in first. I was green in those days, and I can remember thinking that no-one could have survived
in that cauldron of destruction. The next second a sniper got poor old Sergeant Svergan, and rebel sewer-rats attacked
us from behind, and then we were fighting for our lives with knives, fraggers and rifle-butts. Only four of us survived out
of my squad. I never though Vogen was going to be easy again after that…”

                                                                             Veteran Sergeant Hessel, 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
%
I salute you!
For though our
path has been
bloody, you
have served our
Lord with
unflinching
courage and the
honour of true
warriors. We
have seen many
fall today and
must remember,
even as we die,
that our blood
too is welcome…

  Last words of
   the Renegade
Harkan Ironfist
%
“If it was a miracle then it was a Kantrael short-pattern nineteen-megathule Lasrifle miracle.”

                                  General Karnow of the 122ⁿᵈ Cadian after his victory at Vogen
%
“I’ll be back…”
Warlord Ghazgkhull Thraka
%
“I’m da hand of Gork and Mork, dey sent me to rouse up da
boyz to crush and kill ‘cos da boyz forgot what dere ‘ere for.
I woz one of da boyz till da godz smashed me in da ‘ead an’
I ‘membered dat Orks is meant to conquer and make slaves
of everyfing they don’t kill.
I’m da profit of da Waaagh an’ whole worlds burn in my
boot prints. On Armour-Geddem, I led da boyz through da
fire deserts and smashed da humies’ metal cities to scrap. I
fought Yarik, old one-eye at Tarturus, an’ he fought good but
we smashed iz city too.
I’m death to anyfing dat walks or crawls, where I go nothin’
stands in my way. We crushed da stunties on Golgotha, an’
we caught old one-eye when da speed freeks blew da
humies’ big tanks ta bits. I let ‘im go ‘cause good enemies iz
‘ard to find, an Orks need enemies ta fight like they need
meat ta eat an’ grog ta drink.
I iz more cunnin’ than a grot an’ more killy than a dread,
da boyz dat follow me can’t be beat. On Pissenah we
jumped da marine-boyz an’ our bosspoles was covered in
da helmets we took from da dead ‘uns. We burned dere port
an’ killed dere bosses an’ left nothin’ but ruins behind.
I’m Warlord Ghazghkull Mag Uruk Thraka an’ I speak wiv
da word of da gods. We iz gonna stomp da ‘ooniverse flat
an’ kill anyfing that fights back. We iz gonna do this coz’
we’re Orks an’ we was made ta fight an’ win!”

                      Graffiti on Warlord Titan wreckage found
                      by Dark Angels at Westerisle, Piscina IV
%
“In my years with the regiment I have fought on the burning sulphur fields of Krigos IV, on the blizzard-swept plains of
Mons Frigidus, and in the hard vacuum of deep-space, but none of these matched the horrors I faced fighting in the
ruined streets of Vogen. It was a blsted, smoke-palled hell where death lurked at every turn and where brave men went
insane from fear and suffering. I thank the Emperor that I survived, and I pray to him I will never have to return to such
a place again…”

                                                                            Veteran Sergeant Hessel, 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
%
“In the grim darkness of the far future there is only war!”
%
In the grim darkness of the far future, there is only war.
%
“In the open field
armies are
commanded by
their generals. In
cities, armies are
commanded by
their sergeants.”

   Colonel Tolsten
          Hart M38
%
Innocence proves nothing
%
INQUISITOR THRAX…
…cleared his throat and dictated the last section of his report.

“The mutants have been eradicated throughout the Chapter. The tainted officers
have been slain. The Chapter Master chose to take his own life rather than face
his deserved fate. The creatures he summoned have been banished, or have
returned to the Warp. From past experience, we know that the link, once broken, must needs be
established from our side of the warpgates.”

“That will not happen again in this place. My administration of
justice has made sure of that. The unfortunate lapses of the last
months have been cleansed. Full casualty reports are attached.”

“I can now confidently claim that, under their new - and morally
pure - corps of officers, the reformed Grey Slayers Chapter of
the Legiones Astartes will prove as loyal in future as they did
in the past.”

“Hail the Emperor!”

“Thrax, Inquisitor Ordinary, This day of etc etc… Make a good
copy and then return so that I may seal the despatch.”

“Yes, Lord Inquisitor.”

Thrax sat down at the former Chapter Master’s desk. He had a
mind to keep it for his own. The workmanship had a certain naive
charm. The inlay work was particularly fine for a backward world,
such intricate patterns, such a pleasing arrangement of woods
and techplastics. One could almost believe that it all meant
something. His finger idly traced across the surface, following
the line of a swirl and loop…

In Warpspace something stirred. Its name had almost been used.
Soon the Word would be used, and the Way opened. The
summoning was happening. It could feel the drawing together
of power and intent…

Thrax was thinking hard, and now his finger barely moved. The
Chapter Master had been weak, a fool. But the power he had
tapped! Properly used, in the service of the Emperor, could it
not make him the best, the greatest, of all the Inquisitors? His
finger moved across the desktop again, following the inlay…

Soon… Soon…

Thrax reached the end of the techplastic line. He half-turned
towards something in the corner of his eye. And the he knew…

NOW!

There was a knock on the door. The scribe had returned.
“Inquisitor Thrax, I have the copy of your report, Lord.” His
voice filled with doubt. “Inquisitor… Thrax? My Lord?”

In a rush of mandibles and heaving flesh, Inquisitor Thrax feasted.
%
It had once been an occupied position.
The gun emplacement had protected thirty of
the Eldar’s dark kin, but now resembled
nothing so much as an abattoir. Shredded
Eldar corpses lay strewn around, torn to pieces
by an hour long bombardment from the
Ultramarine’s Whirlwinds nearly a thousand
metres away. The fortifications were pock-
marked with shrapnel hits, but were for all
intents and purposes intact. Captain Invictus
had vetoed the Imperial Guard Colonel’s plan
of shelling the position with Earthshaker
cannons, realising that when the Dark Eldar
counter-attacked, as he knew they would any
minute, the Imperial forces would need this
position. Four Space Marine Rhinos sped
across the snow and ground to a halt beside
the emplacement, the ceramite doors sliding
smoothly back along oiled runners. Warm air
from inside the vehicles condensed as the
winter’s chill rushed to fill the troop
compartments. With practised precision the
Space Marines disembarked from their vehicles,
the Devastators immediately taking up firing
positions. When the Dark Eldar attacked, they
would find the Space Marines ready and
waiting for them.
%
“It is the purest folly to believe that an individual can save Armageddon. Wars are not won by heroes, they
are won by firepower and force, and the application of strategy and tactics.”

                                                                                          Commissar Yarrick
%
“Krukfang pushed the control stick forward and steered Deffblasta down into a straffing run. The words of Gobstikk
came back to him from when the Mekaniak had been teaching the young Krukfang how to fly. Long, uncontrolled bursts
the clever Mek had taught him…”

                                                                                                   “Fighta-Bommer”
%
“Let the butchery commence!
Decapitate and annihilate!
Let the red river flow!”

- Arboroath the Ever-Bloodied
%
“Life is not measured in years, but in the deeds of men.”
%
Listen not to the alien, look not upon the alien, speak not unto the alien
%
Logan Grimnar,
Bloody-handed warrior,
He piles the skulls of his enemies.
He builds a mound of the fallen.
His foes weep rivers of woe.

Logan Grimnar,
The strong wolf of the pack,
His sword hungers for red flesh.
His guns thirst for battle.
He laughs amidst the battle-din.
Logan Grimnar, father of wolves,
His sons hunt his enemies,
Slay them where they falter,
And bring their pelts to Fenris.

                         taken from
        “The Saga of Logan Grimnar”
%
LORD INQUISITOR GRÜNDVALD, on behalf CONCLAVE-CONSERVATI
       Thought begets heresy; heresy begets retribution.
%
“Look upon me and know that I can
slay you at will. You have no defense
save one: to look into the darkness at
the back of your own mind. There, you
will find Father Nurgle waiting to offer
you life in return for your submission.
Deny him, and you are mine.”
%
Lush green fields sped below the two skimming Saim-hann Falcon grav-tanks as
they hugged the contours of the land. Blurs of red and black, they smoothly
banked around a rocky outcrop and rose to crest a wooded ridge. Bright sunlight
glittered from the barrels of the skimmers’ pulse lasers and shuriken cannons.
While their kin fought the Mon-keigh on the eastern plains, the Falcons circled
around the flanks to bring death from behind. Each carried a squad of Howling
Banshees, Aspect Warriors whose skill in close combat was beyond compare. The
Falcon pilots knew that the crude tanks of the Mon-keigh were manoeuvring in
an attempt to intercept them, but their tracked vehicles were far too slow and
clumsy. They would not be successful and the Eldar would triumph.
%
Most revered Prioress Helena (the Virtuous) of Convent Sanctorum,

My commendations go to your Sisters of the Order of the Valorous Heart in their
undertakings against the heretical infidels infesting Hive Tumulus on Farglum.
The Holy Order’s response to my request was most prompt, making planetfall less
than a week after my entreaty was directed to them.

The fury of their righteous anger was exemplary, and countless souls were returned to
the Emperor through the purifying fire of the weapons and strength of their
unyielding faith.

Through their actions, the hive was purged of its blasphemous perversions, and the so-called Cult
Epicurean was all but eradicated. The last few of its foul ‘prophets’ and apostates have fled deep within
the abyss of the underhive, where my companions and I pursue them still.

The holy fury displayed by the Canonness Brigitta and her Sisters was devastating to the unholy cultists.
An inspiration to behold! The terror they induced amongst the corrupted hivers caused a wave of devotion to
spread through the hive. Praise be to the Emperor! The sacred Order of the Virtuous Heart are a credit to the
Ecclesiarchy, and indeed to the Imperium as a whole.

                                 Inquisitor Scallen, Ordo Hereticus, 0425085.M41
%
“Myriad are the ways of war. The lightning strike, the tenacious defence, the cunning ruse; all have their time and
place, oft as not dictated by the lie of the land or balance of forces that you find at your disposal. The art of war
is learning how to bind the tactics, terrain and forces at your command to your advantage.”

                                                                                                     Imperium Tactica
%
'Never before or since have I seen fighting such as I witnessed when that host fell upon the Orks.
Seizing the moment, I regrouped my Company and led them once more into the fray, yet there was
little work for us, for the greenskins lacked stomach for the fight. Soon we secured the great
bastion once more and without further loss. Of the dark brotherhood there was no sign.'

                                                                                  - Varro Tigurius
                                                                      Ultramarines Chief Librarian
%
“Only faith in the Emperor and the training I am going
to give you will save you on the battlefield.”

                               Veteran Sergeant Kesser
%
Only the Awkward question; only the Foolish ask twice.
%
Possession was once nine-tenths of
the lore. It is so even today, but we
must blind ourselves to the tenth
that remains and was once a Human.
Duty requires that we put aside such
considerations and root out
uncleanliness in thought and deed.
There can be no other course of
action. No-one can be adjudged
innocent of compliance. Better to
self destruct than acquiesce.

             - The Book of Exorcisms,
       The Verses of Inquisitor Enoch
%
Quietly, the quintet of ochre-clad troops picked their way down the
corridor of the bombed-out workshop, moving through the dust-
filled air, but Gol Kolea could hear the hollow crackle of their terse
vox-signals barking back and forth.

He slid back into cover and made a hand gesture that his company
could read. They moved back, swallowed by the shadows and the
dust.

Gol let five troopers advance down the corridor far enough until
the last one was standing on the false flooring. Then he connected
the bare end of the loose wire in his hand to the terminals of the
battery pack.

The concussion mine tore out a length of the corridor and
obliterated the last trooper where he stood, tearing the one directly
in front of him into pieces with fragments of shrapnel and shards of
bone from his exploded comrade.

The other three fell, then scrambled up, firing blind in the smoke.
Bright, darting bars of las-fire pierced the smoke cover like reef fish
scudding through cloudy water.

Gol smashed out his fake wall and came down on the first of them
from the rear, swinging the hook-bill of his axe-rake down through
helmet and skull.

Sergeant Haller dropped down from the ceiling joists where he had
been crouching and felled another of them, killing him with point-
blank shots from his autopistol as his bodyweight flattened the
trooper.

The remaining Zoican switched to full auto and swung wild. His
withering close-range shots punched right through a flak-board
wall partition and blew the guts and things out of the Machinesmith
Vidor, who had been waiting to spring out from behind it.

Nessa came out of cover under some loose sacking and slammed
the rock-knife into the back of the Zolcan’s neck. She held on,
screaming and yanking at the blood-slick knife-grip as the trooper
bucked convulsively. By the time he dropped, his head was nearly
sawn off.

Gol hurried forward, pricking Nissa up and pulling her off the
corpse. She handed the bloody rock knife to him, shaking.

‘Keep it,’ he mouthed. She nodded. Eardrums ruptured by a close
shell on the seventh day, she would never hear again without
expensive up-hive surgery and implants.
 
‘You did good,’ Gol signed. She smiled, but the fear in her eyes and
the blood on her face diffused the power of the expression and
diluted the beauty of the young woman.

‘Not so easy,’ she signed back. Being now unable to modulate the
volume of her own voice, she’d learned to sign her remarks early
on.

Gol looked round. Haller and the other members of Gol’s team had
recovered four working lasguns, two laspistols and a bunch of
ammunition webs from the dead by then.

‘Go! Move!’ Gol ordered. He took a last look at Vidor’s corpse and
nodded a moment of respect. He had liked Vidor. He wished the
brave machinesmith had found the chance to fight. Then he
followed his company out.
%
Rather than flying into combat, the
Chaos Lord landed on the ramp to the
courtyard and ran towards Fane in a low
crouch. The first Guardsmen thrust too
soon, a slight twist of Gorsameth’s left
claw deflected the bayonet, and before
the Guardsmen could recover his
weapon the right claw raked his throat
and he fell, gurgling, to the floor. The
second Guardsmen was more careful,
waiting for the traitor’s rush before
stabbing. His bayonet glanced off the
ceramite breastplate, jarring his
shoulders and entangling in the raptor
jump pack wing. A lightning swift slice
of the assailant’s claws cut off his
hands, leaving the lasgun dangling
from the towering Nigth Lord. With a
sudden change of balance, Gorsameth
kicked out, sending a crate of
ammunition that must have weighed as
much as a man flying at the surviving
Cadians. The last Guardsmen,
Corporal Reille, shouldered Fane aside
and grunted as the crate smashed into
him. He’d already thrown away his
flamer, and a long fighting knife with a
notched wooden handle was in his
hand. Instinctively he dropped, rolling
with the crate’s impact just as the claws
parted the air above him. Stabbing
upward, he grappled with Gorsameth,
desperation granting him the
strength to hold back the massive
Chaos Marine and shout “Captain,
Now!” Back on guard, Captain Fane
raised his power sword and saw that
Gorsameth’s guard was down as he
shifted his grip on the brave
Guardsmen, his barbed claws slicing
through armour.

From a nearby street the Sorcerer
Asuramandos watched the battle
through his minds’ eye, and spoke
quietly, “No, not before we have your
soul,” he said, his body tensing briefly
and then relaxing.

In the precinct house courtyard, Fane’s
hand twisted involuntarily on the hilt as
the blade descended, catching
Gorsameth with the flat of the blade
only. The next thing Fane heard was
the Guardsmen being crushed in
Gorsameth’s cold bearhug. Reille’s
bones cracked and he was dropped
like a broken rag doll at Fane’s feet.
Fane stood alone, his sword hanging
limply by his side, the bodies of his
platoon stretching out before him. He
felt despair and terror all around him
like a shroud as the gaze of the Chaos
Lord fell upon him. The urge to cower
and beg, to promise anything to
prevent his doom welled up inside him.
Just then, his eyes glimpsed the
banner of the 122ⁿᵈ lying in the dirt
and a decade of martial pride pushed
the tendrils of dark sorcery from his
mind. Straightening, he met
Gorsameth’s gaze and spat “Traitor!”
before the claws tore out his heart.
%
"Remember: short, controlled bursts."
%
Rocks are not ‘free’, citizen.

Firstly, you must manoeuvre the Emperor’s naval vessel within the asteroid belt, almost
assuredly sustaining damage to the Emperor’s ship’s paint from micrometeoroids, while
expending the Emperor’s fuel.

The the Tech Priests must inspect the rock in question to ascertain its worthiness to
do the Emperor’s bidding. Should it pass muster, the Emperor’s Servitors must use the
Emperor’s auto-scrapers and melta-cutters to prepare the potential ordinance for
movement. Finally, the Tech Priests finished, the Emperor’s officers may begin
manoeuvring the Emperor’s warship to abut the asteroid at the prepared face (expending
yet more of the Emperor’s fuel), and then begin boosting the stone towards the offensive
planet.

After a few days of expending a prodigious amount of Emperor’s fuel to accelerate
the asteroid into an orbit more fitting to the Emperor’s desires, the Emperor’s ship
may then return to the planet via superluminous warp travel and await the arrival of
the stone, still many weeks (or months) away.

After twiddling away the Emperor’s time and eating the Emperor’s food in the wasteful
pursuit of making sure that the Emperor’s enemies do not launch a deflection mission,
they may finally watch the ordinance impact the planet (assuming that the Emperor’s ship
does not need to attempt any last-minute course correction upon the rock, using yet more
of the Emperor’s fuel).

Given a typical (class Bravo-CVII) system, we have the following:
              Two months, O&M, Titan class warship:             4.2 Million Imperials
              Two months, rations, crew of same:                0.2 MI
              Two months, Tech Priest pastor:                   1.7 MI
              Two months, Servitor parish:                      0.3 MI
              Paint, Titan class warship:                       2.5 MI
              Dihydrogen peroxide fuel:                         0.9 MI
              Total:                                            9.8 MI

Contrasted with the following:
              5 warheads, magna-melta:                          2.5 MI
              One day, O&M, Titan class warship:                0.3 MI
              One day, rations, crew of same:                   0.0 MI
              Dihydrogen peroxide fuel:                         0.1 MI
              Total:                                            2.9 MI

Given the same result with under one third of the cost, the Emperor will have saved a
massive amount of His most sacred money and almost a full month of time, during which
His warship may be bombarding an entirely different planet.

The Emperor, through this - His Office of Imperial Outlays - hereby
orders you to attend one (1) week of therapeutic accountancy
training/penance. Please report to Areicon IV, Imperial City,
Administratum Building CXXI, Room 1456, where you are to sit in
the BLUE chair.

For the Emperor,

Burusarius Tenathis,

Purser Level XI,

Imperial Office of Outlays.
%
Sergeant Curtis stabbed his bayonet
through the head of a Termagant, pulling
the trigger to blast its body clear. He
could hear an ominous rattling from
somewhere on the other side of the
defensive wall, but didn’t have time to
wonder what it might be as another
Termagant attempted to tear out his
throat. He shot the beast in the belly
and staggered as a massive impact
thundered into the compound’s exterior
wall. Man-killing chunks of plascrete
tumbled from the wall and Curtis
watched in horror as a massive,
segmented body pushed its snake-like
bulk over the smashed remnants of the
defences. It’s enormous forelimbs ended
in gigantic, razor claws, blazing coronas
of electrical energy arcing downwards
into the terrified Imperial Guardsmen,
burning them to death where they stood.

The vast monster reared up on its
bloated body, as though taking a deep
breath and the coruscating halo of blue
fire surrounding its claws began
expanding, growing brighter and more
intense. Curtis screamed a warning and
turned to run, but it was already too
late. A blinding geyser of blue-white
electrical flame erupted from between the
beast’s talons, fountaining through the
ranks of his terrified soldiers. Curtis ran
for his life, but the Trygon’s discharge
washed over him seconds later. The
electrical inferno instantly seared the
flesh from his bones, his blackened
skeleton running through the flames for
another two strides before finally
collapsing in a smoking pile of scorched
bones.
%
“Since the time of The Fall,
our race has been haunted by what we,
in our reckless pursuit of hedonistic indulgence,
gave birth to. Though our dreams once overturned
worlds and quenched suns, we are now but fitful
shadows clinging to the edge of existence. All the stars in
the sky cannot blot out the hateful glare of the Red Moon’s
Eye. The birthing place of The Great Enemy pulses with all the
malice of a daemon that is dreaming, casting its shadow over
all we have ever done and all we ever shall. Every twisted strand
of Fate and casting of the Runes leads me to this time, to this
place, and it is clear that the final battle awaits me to this time, to this
Crone Worlds. A conflict the likes of which has not been seen
since the Mon-Keigh warred amongst themselves, and their corpse
of a seer fell to his traitorous son, is coming and all my steps lead
towards it, no matter that I walk other paths. I see the stars
stained red with the blood of the Mon-Keigh and, though their
wars do not concern me and I would gladly let them destroy one
another, I know that to avoid this fight is to condemn my race
to inevitable doom. And though all I see is darkness, I know
that I will not flinch from my destiny.”

                                                            Eldrad Ulthran -
                                                Farseer of Ulthwé Craftworld
%
Sister Aliesha sang lustily along with the devotional hymns
reverberating from the loudspeakers attached to the hull of the
Immolator tank as it neared the mob of men in the marble
flagged square. Thinking they had the holy shrine surrounded,
the rebel planetary defence troopers swarmed around the shrine
of Our Lady of the Perpetual Martyr. Their raucous cries were
drowned out by the singing of the charging Battle Sisters.
Squads of Seraphims descended from the armoured buttresses of
the vast cathedral, bolt pistols chattering a litany of death as the
explosive bolts impacted deep into unarmoured flesh.

One of the rebel troopers recognised the armament of the
Immolator as it rumbled steadily towards enemy lines. Shorn of
the long-range firepower of the Adeptus Astartes tanks, the
flamethrower tank required proximity to fulfil its role as
purifier of the heretics. Autogun fire ricocheted from the front
of the tank, and Aliesha heard a clank as the top hatch of the
Immolator was thrown open. Sister Bacharia swung her heavy
bolter out of the passenger compartment, sending a continual
stream of large calibre explosive bolts into the heretics assailing
the sides of the tank. They were close to surrounding her now.
At Aliesha’s signal, Sister Bacharia ducked back inside and
closed the top hatch. Aliesha thumbed the button that fired up
the ignition flame of the Inferno cannon and flexed her
gauntleted fingers on the trigger mechanism. The holy fire of
her weapon, blessed this very morning by the Canoness, would
soon show these blasphemous fools the error of their ways.
%
“Some called him a monster, a madman. Indeed the line between ecstatic determination and insane ruthlessness is vague
and wavering. It is true that he ordered the bombardment of worlds until they submitted. It is also true that he
would have driven his men into the jaws of death for all eternity had they not finally grown weary. It is true that he
would sometimes order the butchering of whole worlds that opposed his force. But this was not all that he was. He was
magnanimous in victory and many were the times he spared a world that had impressed him with its courage and resolve.
He was a deeply spiritual men too, driven ever onwards for the greater glory of the Emperor, not only his own fame. He
was consumed by his desires, a passionate man who was willing to pay any price to fulfil his dreams of conquest. The
Imperium needed such a man at that time, as it stood on the threshold of greatness once again. The Apostasies had passed,
the Treaty of Ceres had reunited Earth and Mars once again and the Conclave of Mount Amalath was witness to such
great promises. He was the man to fulfil those promises, to stretch out the Emperor’s grasp once more. It was he who
dragged the reborn Imperium through the fires of battle, screaming a new birth cry as its golden age came about, the
zenith of Mankind’s power. Without him, who is to say what might not have come to pass, what doubts would have been
seeded in the heart of the Imperium once more. No-one can dare say they think of him without humble gratitude for the
marvels he performed. Many men have been dubbed insane for putting into practice what many Saints have preached. Solar
Macharius was such a man.”

                                                                   Extract from General Sejanus’ ‘Breaching the Darkness’
%
“Some people think that cityfighting is all the same, but I can tell you isn’t. In Vogen we had to fight the rebels on the
streets, in buildings, and in the sewers, and every street, building and sewer was different. We were ordered to capture
cityblocks, clear strong-points, or defend a building at all costs, and every mission was different. There were more ways
to fight than there are planets in the Imperium, and even more ways to die…”

                                                                            Veteran Sergeant Hessel, 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
%
“Some says we’z Feral, nomadz they calls uz. I just say
we’z always marching, konkering we iz…”

                                  Warlord Snagga Snagga
%
“Strike fast and suddenly. Attack without warning. Secure victory
before the foe is aware of his danger. Remember always, a war is
easily won if your enemy does not know he is fighting.”

                                     Lord General Solar Macharius
%
Sweet merciful Emperor, the secrets of the
Black Library unlocked by the sorcerer
of the Red Cyclops! Better that Czevak
has perished to some foul xeno creature than
fall into his clutches. I shall mobilise the 34ᵗʰ
Gudrunite Rifles and petition the
Chapter Master of the Iron Hands
for his warriors’ aid.

I pray I am not too late.
%
Take care, lest your protests grow tiresome. I have
asked for so little! Anyone would think that I had
asked you to sacrifice yourselves and your sons! And
yet, in Slaanesh’s boundless and pleasing mercy, I have
asked only for your daughters. Surely you would not
deny me my small enjoyments?

                    - Tyrell, Renegade Lord of Arden IX
%
THE BATTLE FOR BLADEN
THE GOTHIC WAR - 143.M41
At the start of the Gothic War the Imperial Navy anchorage above the
Hive World of Bladen in the Lysades sub-sector was devastated by
Abaddon’s surprise attack. The Traitor Marines of the Black Legion
took the opportunity to attack Massena Hive. The Ecclesiarchy was
strong on Bladen and Massena was the site of their greatest
cathedral. The Mission of the Emperor Triumphant was the oldest
Ecclesiarchy building in the sub-sector, built on the side of an
Apothecarion said to have been founded during the Great Crusade it
was a place where the Emperor himself was believed to have trod.

The Chaos fleet subjected the hive to a sustained bombardment, the
city shield held but the Imperial forces in the city were blinded to
events outside. The Black Legion landed as close to Massena as the
subterranean rail-link running from Massena to Tegus hive. Passing
beneath the shield the rail-link was secured by a series of massive
gates, these were opened by insurgents to admit Abaddon’s forces.

Before the Cathedral was the Square of Final Redemption,
surrounded on the other three sides by the towering buildings of the
Administratum. In the square the men of the 35ᵗʰ Cadian threw a line
of improvised defences across the approaches and took their stand
at the foot of the steps leading up to the Cathedral gates, Cardinal
Andralios stood behind them under the Ecclesiarchal banner
surrounded by his Confessors.

The initial attack came in the north, the fortified Imperial Exchange
building was rocked by repeated salvos of missiles before a wave of
Black Legionaries swarmed through the desperate fire of the
defenders and using meltabombs forced entry in half a dozen places.
The Traitor Marines cleared a foothold with their flamers before
squads of vile Plague Marines forced their way in and crushed all
resistance. The defenders found the Plague Marines to be virtually
invulnerable and one by one they fell to the festering plague knives,
weakened by the aura of corruption and decay that shrouded their
enemies.

The roof of the Imperial Exchange was sson packed with Black
Legion havoc squads. Almost at once a firefight erupted across the
ancient plaza as the havocs engaged the Imperial forces around the
square. Suddenly he barricades blocking the roads entering the
square to either side of the Imperial Exchange were smashed aside
by lumbering Chaos Dreadnoughts leading a veritable sea of
summoned daemons. Everywhere the morale of the defenders
wavered. Only the forces gathered around the Cathedral kept their
nerve and buried themselves in the litany of loading and firing. The
daemonic horde was halted some fifty paces from the steps and then
driven back inexorably by the unceasing volley fire. The many
statues of saints and martyrs that adorned the square were
destroyed alongside the abominations of Chaos. The daemons
began to fade, their grip on the real universe waning under the
physical bombardment of the Guardsmen and the faith of the
Ecclesiarchy. Left alone the Chaos Dreadnoughts rampaged on but
were unable to break through the line although one overturned a
Leman Russ and set a clawed foot on the Cathedral steps before it
was destroyed.

As the last Dreadnought was reduced to mangled metal an unearthly
screech from above announced the arrival of the Chaos Raptors.
Dropping onto the Cathedral’s, retinue they were soon engaged in a
merciless hand to hand battle, which raged up and down the
smell of ozone mingled with daemons ichor and human fear. The
Black Legions’ Chaos Terminators had teleported into the thick of the
action. Their initial salvo cut through the Cardinal’s guards bringing
down Andralios’ banner along with the Cardinal himself. With his
death resistance crumbled.

The ways in which the Cathedral was defiled were gross and
barbarous. Thousand of citizens were slaughtered to complete the
desecration. Such was the horror that even after Abaddon’s
departure the city was a place of madness and corruption. The taint
of Chaos was upon it and in 159.M41, sixteen years after it fell to the
dark gods Massena was put to rst by a blessed Exterminatus at the
command of Lord Admiral Ravensburg and the Inquisitor Lord
Proccuppio Vex.
%
The beat of powerful wings, a sense of
dephtless sadness. That it should come to
this… comrades in arms locked in a battle to
the death. Then he saw him, his brother once,
his enemy now. Flashing blades and and
explosion of blood, screaming pain flaring
round his body like an electric charge and he…

…opened his eyes, sweat coating his
skin with an oily sheen, his mouth
filled with blood. He swallowed and
ran his tongue over his teeth, fighting
back the visions. But no matter how
hard he pushed them away, they were
always there, lurking at the back of his
mind. Brother Captain Erasmus Tycho
stood and turned to leave the chapel,
stopping as he saw Chaplain
Lemartes standing in the archway, his
face shrouded in the dancing shadows
cast by the electro-flambeaux.

“Were you seeing them again?” asked
Lemartes.


Tycho nodded slowly. “Yes…” he
whispered, “I see them even now, I
can feel his pain, it burns me.”

Lemartes approached Tycho and
placed his hands on his friend’s
shoulders. He had always known it
would come to this, but still he felt
sorrow. Fitting that it should come on
Armageddon. He could see Tycho’s
glassy eyed stare and knew that part
of his mind was no longer here in the
now but had been wrenched back to
the time of the Great Betrayal. To the
last battle of their Primarch
Sanguinius. To his death.


“Have they considered my… request?”
asked Tycho.

“They have, my friend,” replied
Lemartes sadly.

“And?”

“You shall have your wish, Erasmus.
The honour of leading the forlorn hope
into the Tempestora breach on the
morrow is yours. Come, I shall
perform the moripatris.”

                 *****

Arrayed in his newly painted black
armour, Tycho stared fixedly towards
the besieged Hive Tempestora as the
Chaplains moved amongst the men of
the forlorn hope, the first men into the
breach. The first men to die. He felt
his pulse race and his breathing
quicken… The Imperial palace was in ruins
thousand were dead… He blinked and
watched as vast bellied Gargants…
Daemon visaged Titans stalked through the
rubble of Terra like predatory gods, killing and
destroying all in their path… lurched into
firing positions before the hive.
Somewhere in the cratered hell before
him was the enemy who had horribly
disfigured him all those years ago…
One man’s betrayal had brought them to this,
one man’s vanity and pride. But they had a
chance to end it here. His Emperor had made
the decision to take the fight to Horus and
Sanguinius of the Blood Angels would not fail
him… Chaplain Lemartes stopped
before Tycho and dipped his finger
into a blood filled chalice. He anointed
Tycho’s helmet with blood in the form
of a jagged saltire and said, “With my
blood I commend your soul to the
Emperor. May he watch over you this
day.”

“And you also Dorn,” said Tycho
taking Lemartes’ hand in the warrior’s
grip, wrist to wrist. “One last time,
brother.”

“Yes,” agreed Lemartes, knowing that
Tycho was finally lost to him. “One last
time.”

                  *****

Tycho smashed another Greenskin
from the rubble with a backhanded
sweep of his fist. Bones cracked and
blood sprayed. The top of the breach
was less than ten metres away.
Gunfire stitched a path towards him,
spurts of dust and stone exploding
around him. He felt the powerful
impacts, but ignored them, charging
up the debris strewn slope. Choking
dust and smoke filled the air. All he
could see were shadowly forms before
him… brother Space Marines, their oaths of
loyalty ashes in the dust. He hated them like
nothing he had ever hated before. A blade
swung at his head, striking his shoulders guard
and tearing upwards… Tycho’s golden
mask tore from his rictus face in a
wash of blood and skin. He screamed
in fury, standing at the top of the
breach, surrounded by his foes.

The Orks swarmed around the Blood
Angels, dying by the dozen as fifty
years of hatred and vengeance poured
through Tycho’s veins. Behind him, the
last Space Marine of the forlorn hope
fall beneath the blades of the Orks…
the others were gone, separated in the
teleportation. He was alone… Tycho fought
with the strength of legend, fighting
and killing all who came near him. He
swept up a fallen sword and continued
the slaughter, the blade rising and
falling, Ork blood sheathing its edge.
No blade could pierce his armour, no
bullet could lay him low. Ork corpses,
scores deep, surrounded him, his altar
of death.

The smoke parted and a massively
powerful Ork, clad in wheezing
mechanical armour, crunched across
the rubble towards him. Black exhaust
fumes belched from rusted pipes and
enormous claws snapped from each
arm. Tycho snarled as the
unquenchable fury of the Black Rage
finally consumed him utterly… Horus
greatest and most beloved of the Primarchs.
Why? When we could have achieved anything
we dreamed of, why? Horus said nothing,
swinging with his bladed fist. Sanguinius
sprang away from the powerful claw, spinning
behind the Traitor. He leapt feet first at Horus
feeling his foe’s fangs break under his boot
heels. He landed lightly, rolling swiftly to his
feet as Horus attacked again. His back was to
the wall, nowhere to go but forwards. The two
brothers met blade by blade and Sanguinius
knew that he could not defeat Horus. The sword
snapped and Horus smashed the claw through
his armour and deep into his belly. Excruciating
agony ripped upwards into his ribcage as Horus
tore his heart out. Sanguinius spat blood into
his brother’s face and hissed. “I die, but you
will die with me, traitor!” as he lashed out with
his fist and ripped out his foe’s throat in a
welter of blood. He felt Horus’ grip slacken and
slumped to the ground, his lifeblood pumping
from his broken body. He could vaguely hear
his companions calling his name, but with each
second their voices grew dimmer. He had not
failed his Emperor. He smiled and closed his
eyes as life slipped away.

                      *****

Lemartes watched the small group of
Space Marines as they bore their
Captain on their shoulders towards the
Imperial lines. The breach had fallen
and the outer ring of fortifications and
bunkers were now in Imperial hands.
Tycho had held the breach long
enough for the rest of the army to
reach the walls and carry the day.
With a tenderness that belied the
gore-streaked appearance of the
Blood Angels, they laid Brother
Captain Erasmus Tycho at the feet of
Chaplain Lemartes. He knelt by the
bloody corpse, laying a hand on his
brow and staring at his friend’s face.
Perhaps it was just the relaxation of
muscle that followed death, but he
believed he could see a softening in
Tycho’s features, as though the
terrible disfigurement done to him
had retreated within his flesh. He
hoped so.

“Farewell brother,” he whispered. “You
will not be forgotten.”
%
The candles flickered as the Sanctum
door was quietly opened. The
Adeptus Sororitas novice padded
softly across the marble floor
through the cloud of incense,
standing respectfully behind the
kneeling Sister Superior. She waited
patiently for acknowledgment.

‘Yes, my child?’ asked Sister
Superior Candida without looking up
from her devotions.

‘The mob approaches, Sister.’
whispered the novice, her voice
betraying her unease. ‘It will be at
the gates soon.’

Sister Candida was remaining kneeling
as concluded her prayers.

‘Give us strength, Divine Lord. May
your will be done.’

She stood, turning from the effigy
of the Emperor to face the young
novice. ‘Fear not, my child. The
Emperor is with us. We shall’
prevail.’

               ***

The stout, wooden doors of the
cathedral were thrown open as the
Battle Sisters marched onto its steps,
chanting hymns to the Emperor and
raising their ritually blessed weapons
of faith. Bolter shells rained down
the steps and arcane weaponry
spouted cleansing fire. High above,
the angelic forms of the Seraphim
dropped from the dark, towering
spires, bolt pistols spitting death.

Sister Superior Candida stood at the
top of the marble steps, her bolter
kicking in her arms as she pumped
shell after shell into the heretics.
The light from inside the cathedral
framed her in a glowing halo of
brilliance.

‘Death to the defilers!’
%
The canyons of the ruined city trapped the smoke, dust and noise of battle, turning
each rubble-choked street into a hell of half-glimpsed shadows and phantoms. Trooper
Korkin nervously licked his lips, glancing up the shattered street along the gunsight of
his lascannon. There were reports of Eldar movements in this sector and he didn’t want
to suffer the same fate as 1ˢᵗ Platoon. They’d been found cut to shreds with the
safeties still on their guns. He and Frederiks were positioned a hundred metres in
front of their platoon, an early warning in case the decadent aliens came this way. The
though didn’t comfort him much. Korkin cocked his head as a low humming
penetrated the crash of distant artillery and he watched the smoke suddenly part as
though brushed by an invisible hand. The sleek prow of an Eldar vehicle emerged
seconds later. Korkin squeezed the trigger on the lascannon, watching as the powerful
beam rippled as though travelling through water before it struck the fast-moving
vehicle. Korkin’s jaw fell open as the blast scored the vehicle’s side, but did no further
damage. A warm, electric sensation enveloped him as the Wave Serpent’s energy field
washed over him and he never saw the blow from the Striking Scorpion’s chainsword
that killed him.
%
The cavernous chamber was lit by flickering candles and filled
with chanting cultists, its walls daubed with blasphemous sigils.
Men, women, children and a hooded figure in robes of silk and
ermine murmured forbidden chants, standing within a group of
hideous runes painted in a garish pink substance on the floor.

‘Knyas’muad arnitisui motriu’nkya Tzeentch!’ called the robed
figure, the language unknown and the words seeming to stretch
the fragile skein of reality to breaking point. Suddenly, the very
fabric of the universe tore, a gaping wound opened in the meat of
space and time, a gateway to the warp itself. Pulsing, obscene
light, chittering voices and horrific gurglings radiated from the
rent, questing tendrils of unseen abominations sensing the warmth
of the material universe.

A filthy, glowing mass pushed itself clear and began coalescing
into its hideously twisted and daemonic form. Images scudded
across its amorphous body. Faces twisted out of the jelly-like
immaterium, sliding out of true, tenebrous screams issuing from
bloated mouths and wailing, nonsensical gibbering echoing from
the cavern walls. Designs within designs, patterns within patterns
and form upon form warped through the light’s awful geometries,
as it sought to find a form more solid than the fluid matter it
had been born into.

‘Our Master comes!’ breathed the robed figure in rapture.
%
“The Codex Astartes is the holy tome of these loyal Battle
Brothers. The wisdom of the ancients is both scripture and
the unbending rod by which they are measured. In war, they
are fierce and as steadfast as those of old who stood beside
the Emperor and broke the Legions of Horus. In faith and
valour they are unmatched. The torches of their chapels
burn bright with flames whose holy fire has shone upon an
unchanging brotherhood for a hundred centuries. In their
lives and in war, the Codex Astartes is their guide.”
%
The courage shown by the officers and men of the Company was
inspirational. They carried out their duty to the Emperor with
exemplary determination and skill. In difficult circumstances they
managed to acquit themselves in the manner expected of the Regiment.
The selflessness and sacrifice demonstrated by the entire Company
is, and will remain, a shining example of bravery. There were no
survivors of the action.

                             - Approved Records Text: for posthumous
                                   use by units attached to the Ordo
%
“The Chaos taint had only embraced Urthwart for a few months but when we landed to retake it a nightmare awaited
us. Flayes human skin flapped from every streetlight, everywhere you looked grinning skulls were piled in pyramids and
always just around the next corner was an infernal giggling and cackling that seemed to come from the walls
themselves. We lost almost as many men to madness as we did to enemy action…”

                                                                        Veteran Sergeant Hessel, 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
%
The Daemon has many forms. You must
know them all. You must tell the
Daemon from his disguises and root him
out from the hidden places. Trust no-one.
Trust not even yourself. It is better
to die in vain than to live an
abomination. The zealous martyr is
praised for his valour: the craven and
the unready are justly abhorred.

      - The First Book of Indoctrinations
%
The Daemonic leads to two crimes.
You turn from the path of
righteousness. And you abandon the
Emperor as the object of your
devotion. For the first, death is
merely a just retribution. The second
is a heresy so terrible that no
punishment can be sufficient. Yet the
search for an appropriate penalty
continues, and it shall be found.

- Malleus Daemonicus, The Declaration of
                 Ecclesiarch Issus XLVII
%
“The Despoiler comes forth once again, and he cannot be stopped
by force of arms alone. It is his will that the stars be stained red
with the blood of all who oppose him. An infinite horde of fiends,
mutants and cacodaemons obey his command to devour Cadia
alive. But he will not stop there.

If our faith in the Emperor and our force of arms prove strong,
the forces of Chaos can be driven back into hell. If we are found
wanting, Humanity will fall.”

                Lord Inquisitor Hephaestos Grudd of the Ordo Malleus
%
The interior of the prison shuttle was
gloomy, the only light coming through a
weak shaft from a window-slit above the
pressure door. The heavy breathing of men in
deep sleep was the only sound to be heard,
with the odd shuffle of muttered curse as
one or other of the somnolent prisoners
relived some familiar nightmare.

A rattle of chains and the clump of heavy
boots on the metal boarding ramp sounded
from outside, but in their exhaustion not one
of the men inside stirred. The pressure door
hissed open, artificial light blazing in to
chase the shadows into the corners of the
shuttle’s high ceiling. Blinking, stretching and
groaning, the prisoners responded to this
unwelcome wakening. A large silhouette
shuffled lopsidedly up the ramp to stand in
the entrance, its sizeable frame blocking out
most of the light. Heavy chains hung from
the man’s wrists and ankles, connected to a
spiked metal collar around his neck. His mad
eyes
glared into the cell, not really seeing
anything at all.

Two of the prison guards appeared behind
the prisoner and shoved him forward. The
man stumbled a few steps and then tripped
on the doorway rim, falling head first down
onto the mesh decking. He was immediately
back on his feet, growling and snarling
around the leather gag between his teeth. He
took a step forward and the guards reacted
immediately, their suppression mauls lashing
out, sending shockwaves of power across the
brute’s body. After several seconds the man
slumped to his knees and the storm of
blows stopped.

‘Emperor’s teeth, this guy’s an animal!’
someone hissed.
 
‘No talking,’ barked Colonel Schaeffer as he
strode up the ramp and stood at the edge of
the doorway, hands behind his back clasping
a swagger stick. He turned for a moment
and said something to a man beside him
with a heavily scarred face and neck. The
man nodded and then disappeared down the
ramp. Schaeffer turned his attention back to
the prisoners.

‘Take off the shackles,’ he ordered the
guards, his gaze fixing on the man on the
ground.

‘T-take them off?’ one of the guards replied,
giving a horrified glance towards the Colonel.

The Colonel didn’t move, although there was
a slight twitch in his clenched jaw.

‘I do not repeat orders,’ the Colonel replied
tersely, his stare still levelled at the half-
conscious figure on the deck. The guard who
had spoken hurried forward whilst the other
stood ready with his power maul. Pulling a
las-chisel from his belt, the guard burnt out
the rivets on the shackles and they dropped
to the floor with a heavy clang. He stepped
back hastily as the figure pushed himself to
his feet. His hair was matted with sweat,
every muscle in his body twitching with
unnatural tension, and as he turned around
his eyes fell upon the Colonel. With a roar,
he launched himself at Schaeffer, his huge
hands outstretched to grab the Colonel’s
throat. The guards froze in horror, but as the
prisoner lunged towards Schaeffer, the
Colonel stepped back and brought his hand
up sharply. The heel of his hand smashed
into the bridge of his attacker’s nose,
splashing blood across the Colonel’s heavy
dress coat. The man crashed to the deck, his
forehead bouncing off the tip of Schaeffer’s
highly polished left
boot. Rolling over and sitting up, the
prisoner shook his head, and then pushed
himself away from Schaeffer with dazed,
worried glances.

‘Welcome to the rest of your short life!’
called out Mikhaels, the woman the others
called ‘Rocket-Girl’. Grim laughter followed
her comment, which stopped abruptly as the
Colonel snapped the swagger stick in half
with a loud crack.

‘You are all on half water rations today, for
that.’ he told them, stepping forward into the
cell itself and flinging the splintered pieces
of the swagger stick outside. ‘The salvation
of your souls is no laughing matter.’

The newcomer was coming to his senses once
more. Wiping blood from his nose with the
back of his hand, he looked around the
shuttle cell, as if realising where he was for
the first time. His eyes had lost some of
their glazed look.

‘Where the frag am I?’ he asked slowly,
turning to the man in a scuffed officer’s
greatcoat crouching next to him. Everyone
looked at Schaeffer, trying to gauge his
mood - sometimes he was merely surly, and
sometimes he was downright mean.

‘Go ahead, Green, tell him.’ the Colonel
replied to their questioning looks, his face
totally unreadable.

‘You’ve just been volunteered for the Last
Chancers,’ the man the others had
immediately dubbed ‘Hero’ explained dryly
‘For your crimes against the Emperor and
humanity, you will spend your life in this,
the XIII Penal Legion, until such time as
you receive the Emperor’s Absolution from
the Colonel or from the Emperor himself.
And of course, the only way you can receive
the Emperor’s personal absolution is when
you’re dead…’

‘That’s what you are told when you
volunteer,’ growled Schaeffer. He stalked over
and bent down towards the newest ‘volunteer’,
who visibly flinched at the Colonel’s icy
stare. ‘You’re all here because you are traitors
to Mankind and the Immortal Emperor. You
are here because you have failed in your
sworn duty to protect his domains and
subjects, and you have perverted his trust in
you for your own misguided ends. You have
sacrificed your part in securing the future of
the whole humanity for your own selfish
gain. To kill you would be to accept that
you can longer save your immortal souls. If
you were to be ushered into the Emperor’s
presence now, the scales would tip badly
against you when the deeds of your life are
weighed up by his Almighty Presence. This
is why I give you a last chance to prove
yourselves worthy of the Emperor’s
forgiveness. This is why you are here - to
save yourselves from eternal damnation.’

He turned away for a moment, taking two
steps towards the door before whirling on
his heel. His eyes flashed dangerously, his
mouth set in a grimace of disgust.

‘You will atone for your sins, and when you
die you will thank me for allowing you to!’
he snarled, his eyes sweeping across all of
the gathered prisoners.

‘You!’ the Colonel hissed, pointing towards
the kleptomaniac ‘Fingers’ Vagin. ‘Why are
you here?’

‘Cause I canna help stealin’ stuff?’ Fingers
replied tentatively.

‘No,’ whispered Schaeffer, shaking his head
slowly, his hands tightening into fists behind
his back. ‘You are all here because you are
scum. But you are the Emperor’s scum. You
have the skills that are useful to our Immortal
Lord and whether you wish it or not, they
will be made use of.’ 

With a last contemptuous look, the Colonel
turned and marched down the ramp, followed
by the two prison guards. The man with the
scarred face reappeared at the doorway, giving
them a once over with his single eye - the
other was covered with a metal eyepatch
riveted into his face. Liutenant chevrons
were stitched onto the front of his flak
jacket, and his aged face looked as if it had
borne all the cares of the galaxy for a
hundred years.

‘What ’appens to us now?’ Vagin asked the
stranger.

‘Now?’ the man replied with a grim smile on
his face. ‘Now you’re shipped out to some
hellhole you’ve never heard of. There you’ll
fight for the Colonel. Most likely you’ll die.
But if you’re lucky, or as good as some of
you think you are, then you might just crawl
out of there alive. And then you’ll go to
another warzone and another battle, and you’ll
stare death in the face again. And again and
again until one day you’re just a little bit
too slow, or just plain unlucky, and you
catch a bullet or a knife, or a plasma grenade
blows you to bits.’

In the stunned silence that followed, the
Liutenant started laughing, the harsh,
uncaring sound becoming muffled as he hit
the controls and the door slammed down,
plunging them into darkness once more.
%
The Ork Killer Kan toppled backwards, thick black smoke spewing
from its interior and rivulets of molten metal streaming from the
plasma impacts. An injured creature struggled to free itself from the
wreckage, roaring in anger. Brother Janus of the Imperial Fists swung
the turret-mounted plasma guns around, searching for fresh targets as
the Razorback sped forwards, crushing the remains of the Ork
machine.

A solid wedge of Rhinos was charging forwards across the ash plain,
billowing clouds of choking dust blotting out the sun. An entire
Company hurtled towards the Ork held factory complex in Rhino
APCs. Every second vehicle was a Razorback, providing the assault
with much needed fire support. Lascannons, heavy bolters, plasma
guns and multi-meltas laid down wave after wave of punishing
firepower, preventing the Orks from picking off the Imperial tanks
as they sped towards the complex.

Janus saw a mob of Gretchin dragging some kind of artillery piece
forward into cover and cranked the turret around. White-hot bursts
of plasma vaporised the first Gretchin, and the rest ducked hurriedly
into cover as more searing bolts hissed around them. A lucky shot
struck the ammo cart of the gun and blew it high into the air,
lethal shrapnel killing everything nearby. Janus smiled as he watched
burning Gretchin run screaming. The Rhinos halted and
Space Marines began disembarking from their transports. Janus
worked the plasma guns left and right, continuing to pour fire on
the Ork positions, burning anything he could see as the Space
Marines swept into the factory.
%
‘The place breeds recidivists like
a pond breeds scum’

        Inquisitor-General Neve on
      Chaos cult activity on Cadia
%
The pylon had been looming in our windscreen for a while
now, and Fischig swept us around it, almost kissing the
black stone. The moaning song of the wind as it laced
through the geometries of the pylon was now so loud I
could hear it over the racing turbines of the speeder.

The pylon was vast: half a kilometre high and a quarter
square. The upper facing of the smooth black stone was
machined with delicate craft to form holes and other
round-edged orifices no bigger than a man’s head. It was
through these slim, two hundred and fifty metre tubes that
the wind moaned and howled.

And the tubes weren’t straight. They wove through the
pylon like worm tunnels. Tech-magi had tried running tiny
servitor probes through them to map their loops, but
generally the probes didn’t come back.

As we banked up higher for another pass, I could see the
distant shape of the neighbouring pylon, across the moors,
sixty kilometres away. Five thousand, eight hundred and ten
known pylons dot the surface of Cadia, not counting the two
thousand others that remain as partial ruins or buried relics.

No two are identical in design. Each one rises to a precise
half kilometre height and is sunk a quarter kilometre into
the ground. They predate mankind’s arrival in this system,
and their manner of manufacture is unknown. They are
totally inert, by any auspex measure known to our race, but
many believe their presence explains the quieting of the
violent warp torrents that makes the Cadian Gate the
single, calm navigable route to the Ocularis Terribus.
%
The street echoed to the amplified roar of the Chaos Dreadnought, its
plasma cannon glowing like a small sun as it disgorged raw energy, each
bolt creating bubbling pools of molten matter where the road once was. The
Cadians flinched from the heat only to find themselves under fire from the
roof of the cellarion, the storm of explosive bolts forcing them back. A further
burst from the roof of the precinct house forced them back the other way,
men clutching at their flak jackets as the long range shots struck home. The
whole platoon swayed under the terrible volley, cut down like wheat before
the scythe. The high-flying Raptors landed to the rear of their formation and
rushed into them shrieking like daemons. And yet through the din they
heeded Fane’s words,

“Are you not Cadians? Stand uo and fight!”

One by one, they rose to their feet. Ignoring the sickening sight of the
Armoured Fist squad being ripped apart by the Raptors, the 122ⁿᵈ turned
once again to face the precinct house.
%
The training I undertook upon my assignment to the 122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment
was different from the normal activities involved in most regimental
training. I has thus far undergone in my career with the Imperial
Commissariat. My initial surprise was the youth of my companions in the
basic training program, all of whom were much, much younger than myself,
the oldest being perhaps fourteen. I had heard the Cadians began
their training young, but frankly, this astonished me, though not as much
as the level of competence displayed by such youngsters. At first I was
indignant at being forced to train with children, but I was soon to be
disabused of this notion after witnessing their fitness and skill at
arms.

There were many specialised skills I needed to learn very quickly in
order to operate with the Cadians, and the emphasis was very definitely
on improving my stamina and overall strength. For too long I had ridden
in the cupola of a Chimera and the first days of training were harder
than any battle I have fought in. But I was determined to uphold the
honour of my position and refused to fail. In short, after three months
I could run, jump and fight for prodigious distances carrying a
significant weight. Such activities required special determination and
failure is not an option for troopers in the Cadian Regiments. As a newly
assigned Commissar, I had to perform doubly well to earn the respect of
the soldiers.

One of the biggest factors in the Cadian training program is
learning to function as a team. Every challenge and
exercise is undertaken in groups of at least squad
size (and frequently larger) and it is crucial
that the soldiers learn to operate effectively
together. We learned how to move at pace as an
entire group - known as speed marching in the
Kasrkin, and something of an art form. We
also learned the difference between
operating as an individual and as part of
a squad (something I had not previously
considered valuable). Many times during my
first three months I almost faltered and
was forced to rely on my squad to get
through a number of challenges.

It soon became clear to me that it is a
ritual amongst the Cadian troopers to
try and outperform anyone they
perceive as an outsider, and this
insular nature was one of the many
hurdles I had to overcome in my
time with the 122ⁿᵈ. But say what
you will about Cadians, they
are amongst the strongest and most
thoroughly disciplined formations
I have ever had the honour of
serving with.

                                            Excerpted from the memoirs of
                                               Commissar Kotarian Verhek,
                                                          assigned to the
                                            122ⁿᵈ Cadian Regiment 963.M41
%
The two Traitor Marines were in
shadow, the Sorcerer Asuramandos
stood with his legs braced holding
his staff out before him, faint
traceries of quicksilver glittered in the
air around it as the warp obeyed his
will. Despite his evident and intense
concentration he glanced up to his
companion and grinned hawkishly,
“Have you noticed, brother, how so
much of this battle has revolved
around this one accursed building?”

“Of course I have,” replied his
comrade. “First the Arbites stall our
rebel friends there long enough for
the defences to be organised. Then
having paid the bloodprice, the fools
lose it without a fight when their lines
were broken by the Imperial Fists.”

Gorsameth was marginally shorter
than the Sorcerer, but broader, his
shape cloaked by his folded raptor
wings, and, despite his steady voice,
he flexed his lightning claws
impatiently as he spoke.

“Sorcerer… I want to send the
Emperor’s lackeys a message that
this is not over, that the fear will
always be with them. That precint
house is a symbol of this city’s
defiance and it must be destroyed.
The fools have repaired it to serve
as their arsenal and by their actions
have served my purpose. Speak,
Sorcerer, is it time?”

Asuramandos did not reply - his
eyes were far away…
        * * * * * * * * *
Captain Fane started as the comm-
link burst into life, it was clearer than
usual - normally Costman - his
comm operator, had to adjust it
carefully, but he was on the other
side of the room making caffeine. He
was glad it was clear, though,
because the incoming orders were
important. He leapt up, pulling on his
helmet and grabbing his kit,
“Costman, combat kit NOW! Didn’t
you hear the new orders? We’re
rolling out, so MOVE”. Costman
looked blankly at his officer and then
with the resignation of bemused
common soldiers throughout the
Imperium, he obeyed. Shouldering
his lasgun, he followed Fane
pausing only to pick up the
comm-link and ensure that it
was still switched off.

A few city blocks away
Asuramandos looked up,
“They are leaving but they
will quickly forget why,
Hurry.” With a hiss of
anticipation Gorsameth
spread his wings and
leapt skyward
already issuing
the order for
his concealed
troops to
advance.
%
The vault reached up beyond
sight in the gloom. Slanting
shafts of light alive with dancing
dust-motes lent it a spectral
grandeur which outshone even the
darkly clustered pillars and adorned
stoneworks. In the shadows lay
mounds of ancient armour, torn
banners, corroded weapons and
shattered machines which gave it the
air of some forgotten battlefield.
Chaplain Cassius knew better, as did
the youthful Sergeant Tortalus who
dogged his heavily armoured boot
prints as they wound their way to
the centre of the vault. This detritus
of war was a collection of the most
valued trophies from uncounted
campaigns across the galaxy in the
service of the Emperor. They had
been laid here in honour of one of
the Chapter’s most sacred relics. It
stood proudly at the centre of the
vault, bathed in a pool of light. A
tall banner, intricate beyond measure
with victory scrolls and honorifics,
the Ultramarines insignia formed of
glittering gold on a field of purest,
deepest blue. It hung from an
adamantium shaft which was scored
and pitted in many places, as though
it had been burned by acids.

Cassius turned and fixed the
sergeant with a baleful stare. His
though, leathery skin twisted into a
network of scars beneath the half-
mask of bionics which replaced his
right eye and upper jaw as he spoke.

“See here boy, the Banner of
Macragge. Touched by the Emperor’s
own hand when he presented it to
our Primarch Roboute Guilliman at
the beginning of the Great Crusade.
A magical thing is it not? We
Ultramarines have preserved it for
ten millennia through fire and war
and decimation, each generation
passing it on to the next as a
burning torch of our love for the
immortal Emperor who made us. It
has languished in dull stasis
chambers and flown beneath the
suns of a thousand alien worlds. It
has flown here on Macragge itself,
whenever the whole Chapter is
gathered together and it has been
carried forth whenever our brethren
have fought as one against the direst
of foes.

It is said to be made of a stuff
known only to the ancients; light as
silk but strong as steel, flame cannot
burn it and where it is rent asunder
it re-spins itself as perfect as the
day it was first made. It is marked
with the names of all seventy seven
Chapter masters; beginning with
Guilliman and ending with young
Calgar, it carries an honorific for
each Victorix Maxima of the
Chapter which has been declared at
the Imperial palace on sacred Terra.
I myself have had the honour of
being present at nine of those
victories, at once great and terrible
times which I shall carry with me
to the end of my days. I was there
when we raised it over the ruins of
Corinth, I was there when we
carried it aboard our ships at the
Battle of Macragge.”

Tortalus stiffened slightly at the
name. No Ultramarine would not
have done so. The Battle of
Macragge was both the Chapter’s
greatest victory and its most terrible
loss. The Ultramarines’ home world
had been saved and the Tyranids
defeated but at such a cost that it
had taken over two centuries for the
Chapter to fully recover. Cassius let
that sink in for a moment before
continuing.

“After Macragge, young Calgar
declared that the Banner would not
be carried forth again until we had
rebuilt our strength, until we were a
whole Chapter again. It has taken us
two centuries to bring the 1ˢᵗ
Company back to full strength after
its’ sacrifice at Macragge. Only now
does our Chapter Master believe
that we are fit to carry the Banner
of Macragge to war once more.”

The old chaplain turned, went down
upon one armoured knee and intoned
a brief prayer before reverently
touching the pitted banner shaft.

“You know what it is to carry this
banner in war. You become the
vessel of all of us, the symbol of
our unity and strength. You know
the vows and oaths, the words of
what it is to be the Ancient, the
bearer of the battle standard of the
Ultramarines. But do you know the
reality of it? See here.”

Cassius drew out the shaft of the
banner from the hole it rested in
and showed it to the young Space
Marine.

“You see these bright gouges, that is
where Ancient Galatan had his arm
shorn off by an Ork Warlord as he
fought through the breach at
Corinth. He picked up the banner
with his other hand and went
onward, taking three more mighty
wounds to the fore. He did not,
would not die until the battle was
won and never took a backward step.

These burns are from Macragge,
when young Calgar’s barge was
boarded by Tyranids and Ancient
Helveticus led the counter-assault.
He was poisoned and burned unto
death, but still his grip was so tight
that he did not let the banner fall,
even in death he did not dishonour
his Chapter. Do you understand?”

Sergeant Tortalus’ eyes were bright
with reverence. He nodded once,
curtly as if afraid to express himself
further. But Cassius had four
centuries of experience of reading
the hearts of his Brother-Marines,
he knew that this Ancient would
die defending the banner if necessary,
as the others had. He held forward
the shaft. 

“Bear it with pride Ancient Tortalus,
you will take your oaths and carry
it before the Chapter at sunset, as
they load the ships for war.”
%
The very air gibbered with the horror
of the Daemon Prince. It towered
above its minions, fully encased in
bronze armour that smoked as though
fresh from the furnace, the ground
running molten beneath the giant’s
white-hot step. Black horns curved
from the side of its skull, twin red
coals burned beneath the helmet’s
visor and powerful, scaled wings
sprouted from its shoulders. The
dread Abhotha, Scourge of a Million
Worlds, carried a monstrous daemon-
axe in one vast gauntlet and a long,
barbed spear in the other. Its shaft
was the thighbone of a Slaaneshi
daemon, the blade pulsing a dull red.
The spear exuded a loathsome hunger
and the axe moaned as though
scenting the blood soon to be spilt.
The Daemon Prince was a living
engine of death, existing for slaughter
and the laying of skulls at Khorne’s
brass throne. That was its only
purpose and it neither wanted or
needed another. Death had come to
this world.
%
THE WAR IN THE WEB

His heart was beating a rapid tattoo within his chest,
and Nadien had to concentrate to contain his
excitement. It was difficult to do so this close to the
Avatar’s throne room, and doubly so on the eve of
battle, but it would not do to show such an unseemly
display of emotion before his Farseer. Eldrad Ulthran
had called him here to the Dome of Crystal Seers by
name and, though he was intensely curious as to why,
given that he was a warrior not a seer, he was impatient
to return to his training. Niadien carried his helmet in
the crook of his arm, the flexible wraithbone armour
feeling natural against his body and the spirits of its
former wearers filling him with the urge to fight. Dimly,
he remembered the moment he had forsaken the life
of Niadien the poet to become Niadien the Striking
Scorpion Exarch, but that was a long time ago, and
such thoughts were fleeting and ephemeral in the face
of the prospect of battle against the forces of the
ancient enemy. The wraithbone of the Craftworld
pulsed with aggression and thrumming current of
barely suppressed violence saturated every Eldar with
the lust for battle. The Avatar was close to waking and
its dreams of violence and bloodshed permeated every
facet of Ulthwé. The air sang with the promise of battle
and Niadien felt its call resonate in every fibre of his
being.

“The Bloody Handed One calls to you, does he not,
Niadien?” said a soft voice behind him. He spun, hand
involuntarily reaching for his sword, but relaxing as he
saw the venerable Farseer. Eldrad Ulthran made his
way awkwardly through the softly glowing crystal
trees of the dome, leaning heavily on his ornately
carved staff. Niadien saw that his flesh shone with a
faint, crystalline light, the skin translucent and
unyielding.

Niadien nodded curtly. “Yes, I can feel his heat burning
in my veins. The call to war is one I cannot refuse.”

“I know,” said Eldrad softly. “It is your appointed path,
and to deny that is to walk the road that has but one
end.”

Eldrad stopped beside a long and gracefully curved
crystal tree, its structure veined with darting lights and
the suggestion of a peaceful face swimming in its
depths.

“These are dark times for our people, Niadien,” began
Eldrad. “The one called the Despoiler readies his
armies and the Mon-Keigh do not heed my warnings.”

“What has this to do with us, Lord Ulthran?” growled
Niadien. “If the Mon-Keigh wish to destroy
themselves, let them. Ulthwé is all that matters.”

The Farseer nodded. “Normally I would agree with
you, but there are other forces at work here, Niadien.
The silver warriors of the Yngir have returned.”

“The Necrontyr? After so long?”

“Yes. They seek to destroy the remaining Talismans of
Vaul and without them, we are helpless against the
star gods.”

“We should have taken them from the Mon-Keigh
before they could lose them to the Despoiler,” said
Niadien, unable to contain the venom in his tone.

“True,” agreed Eldrad, “but the Jackal God’s foresight
stretches from the dawn of time and eclipses even
mine. He isolated the Gothic sector and we had not
the strength to stop him. But there is worse, Niadien.
Ahriman, the sorcerer of the Red Cyclops, has
breached the webway and he brings his soulless
warriors and the power of ancient magicks.”

Niadien recoiled in horror at the thought of a minion
of Chaos within the sacred pathways of the Eldar.
Such an affront could not be tolerated and his
warrior’s spirit burned with fury at this upstart Mon-
Keigh’s temerity.

“He seeks the Black Library and the ancient
knowledge it contains. He must not discover it, for
there are secrets it keeps that should never have been”
revealed, even to us.”

“He will not discover it while I draw breath,” assured
Niadien. “My strike force is assembled and our
webway portal is prepared. We await only your order
to depart. Send us to war, Lord Ulthran!”

“In time, Niadien, in time,” soothed Eldrad, staring
wistfully at the crystal trees of his ancestors; Farseers
stretching back to the time of the Fall. “The Dark Kin
are also aware of the breach in the webway and mass”
for war. Their efforts to save the twilight city of
Commorragh will be vain and the bloodshed they
will unleash will only make things worse. There is one
amongst them who thirsts for my death and he does
not care that his actions will lead his people, as well as
ours, to their doom.”

“What would you have me do, Lord Ulthran?”

Eldrad turned and rested his hand upon the shoulder
guard of Niadien’s armour, feeling the lust for violence
of all the Exarchs who had worn the armour before
Niadien straining to be unleashed in battle once more.

“We must awake the Avatar of Kaela Mensha Khaine,
Niadien We will need his strength and the fury if his
presence to prevail in the coming war. I have seen
many futures leading to this point and in all of them
the Avatar walks among us.”

Niadien felt his heart swell with pride as he realised
what must come next.

“This is why I have called you here,” said Eldrad
mournfully, drawing a garland of wraithornes from a
pouch at his waist.

“You have been chose, Niadien. You are to be the
Young King.”
%
The weak will always be led by the strong. Where the
strong see purpose and act, the weak follow; where the
strong cry out against fate, the weak bow their hands
and succumb. There are many who are weak; and
many are their temptations. Despise the weak for they
shall flock to the call of the Daemon and the
Renegade. Pay them not and scorn their cries of
innocence - it is better that one hundred innocently
fall before the wrath of the Emperor that one kneels
before the Daemon.

                   - The First Book of Indoctrinations
%
The wise man learns from the deaths of others.
%
The Worldeaters Land Raider
rumbled across the debris-strewn
ground in the armoury’s outer
courtyard, crushing steel and stone
beneath its armoured treads as small
arms fire pattered harmlessly against
its adamantium skin. Its hull-
mounted heavy bolters raked the
loyalist position, the mass-reactive
shells cutting down Imperial
Guardsmen by the dozen. A missile
speared out from the barricades,
smashing into the vehicle’s side.
The explosion rocked the Raider
and slewed it sideways, but the tank
rolled onwards, its thick, multi-
layered armour absorbing the impact.

The Traitor Marine driver gunned
the engine and drove the Raider
straight over the top of the
Imperial position, scattering
Guardsmen and crushing those not
quick enough to dodge the
armoured leviathan. The tracks spun
in the air, throwing up clouds of
dust before the tank crashed down
again. Its twin-linked laser cannons
fired powerful lances of energy at
the bronze doors of the armoury,
blasting them from the building in
a blossom of red flame. The Raider
squealed to a halt, its front ramp
dropping and a hail of combi-bolter
fire spewing from within. The few
defenders that had survived the
explosion were scythed down in a
heartbeat. Terminators in blood red
armour poured from the vehicle,
through the shattered gateway and
into the garrison’s armoury.
Resistance was futile.
%
“There is no art more beautiful and diverse than the art
of Death.”

                                    Laconfir of Biel-Tan
%
There is no problem that cannot be solved
by the tanks of the Imperial Guard!

            Attributed to Warmaster Solar
%
'These craft could be called fearsome, I
suppose. But give me a thousand Valkyries to fill the
sky with fire, and we see what is left of these
alien filth that is worth fearing.'

-Air Marshal Zutrov before the Battle of the Borenza Gulf
%
Thought begets Heresy;
Heresy begets Retribution.
%
THOUGHT FOR THE DAY: MARTYR THYSELF
%
THOUGHT FOR THE DAY: See the alien, kill the alien.
%
Thought for the day: The end justifies the means.
%
Thought for the day: There is only the Emperor, and he is our shield and protector.
%
Though for the day: We shine His
light upon the heathens, for the
darkness hates the light.
%
Thought for the day: Wisdom is the
                     beginning of fear.
%
To: Lord Inquisitor Goreden,
    Ordo Xenos, Nemesis Tessera
From: Interrogator Kieras, Clearance Omicron
Subject: Ahriman of the Thousand Sons
Priority: Ultra High, immediate action requested.
Received: 999.M41
Message Format: Telepathic
Astropathic Duct: Chima Lomas
Thought for the day: Wisdom is the
                     beginning of fear.

Honoured inquisitor, allow me to introduce myself to you. My name is Ferdan Kieras, a loyal servant of the God-Emperor
and former pupil of Inquisitor Czevak. It has been both my pleasure and honour to serve the honourable Inquisitor for
nearly five decades in an investigative capacity, seeking out information as well as undertaking other, more esoteric
missions involving xeno creatures. As sign of my truth, I urge you to seek counsel from the Biologist at Nemesis Tessera and
verify the gene sequence data attached to this message. But now to the substance of this missive.

Is it with heavy heart I bring to your attention the disappearance of my master. I fear a terrible fate has befallen him, and
it was his instruction that in such circumstances, I should contact you and seek guidance. It had long been a dread to my
master that the being known as Ahriman of the Thousand Sons discover his whereabouts and force him to reveal hidden
knowledge imparted to him by the Eldar. To fully understand the dire implications of this, I must unfortunately reveal to
you much knowledge that should best remain secret.

As I am sure you are aware, Ahriman was once a Librarian in the Thousand Sons Legion of Space Marines, and under the
tutelage of his Primarch, Magnus the Red, learned much of the ways of sorcery. In time his mastery of blasphemous magicks
was almost equal of his cyclopean Primarch and his knowledge of forbidden lore corrupted him beyond redemption.
The Thousand Sons were also tainted and Ahriman realised that the Legion would soon be reduced to little more than
gibbering monstrosities. He conceived a great spell to save the legion, called the Rubric of Ahriman. Its energies were more
powerful than he could possibly have anticipated and its effects on the Thousand Sons devastating. Only those with
sorcerous powers were spared its effect, while the remainder of the Legion were reduced to dust within their sealed
suits of armour, becoming little more than fighting automatons. Enraged with Ahriman’s betrayal, Magnus cast him out and
since that day, Ahriman has sought ever more powerful artifacts to increase his understanding of the Warp.

One source of lore that has always eluded him is the Black Library, a vast repository of ancient secrets collated by the
Eldar and gathered together in a hidden place, unknown to the eyes of Man. Only those pure of heart and with the strength
of mind to comprehend the scale of such awful knowledge may enter this place and sup from its wisdom, and my master was
one such individual. Ahriman has long sought Inquisitor Czevak in order to wrest the location of the Black Library from
his mind, but through cunning and machination, my master has thus far eluded his nemesis. But recent developments lead
me to believe that the dread sorcerer has finally caught up with him. A Savant in my employ, having accessed secret files
of the Ordo Malleus regarding Ahriman, was recently found dead, and psychometric readings revealed and individual who
could be none other than Ahriman himself as his killer. A number of other incidents, at first glance unconnected, but upon
further scrutiny linked in the subtlest of ways, all point to the same dire conclusion. My master’s last contact was in the
region of space known as the Sentinel worlds and it is here that I shall begin my search. I shall investigate further, but
it seems clear to me that Ahriman of the Thousand Sons has ensnared Inquisitor Czevak.

If this proves to be the case, then I urge you to use whatever power you can bring to bear on this matter and despatch all
force that can be gathered to hunt down this heretic sorcerer and stop him before he achieves whatever nefarious plan he
intends to implement.

Yours in desperate need,

Kieras

Interrogator Kieras.
%
“Today had been a good day for Krukfang; plenty of
firing, plenty of speed.”
%
“Traitors, heretics, turn and face us,
it’s cleansing time” Sergeant
DeJano roared like a madman as
he triggered his flamer. The line of
Chaos Marines were engulfed in
flame. From below the parapet, two
further gouts of flame roared up
and over the crenellated wall,
wreathing the Night Lords in a sea
of living flame. DeJano laughed
and cried at the same time, certain
that after their charge through hell
to get there, the 122ⁿᵈ had once
again triumphed. Then the flames
died and the Chaos Marines turned
to face DeJano and his comrades.
Their ceramite armour was
blackened but not one had fallem.
With a precise click, a line of
bolters was brought to bear.

Down in the courtyard Captain
Fane heard the voice of Sergeant
DeJano crying out in despair,
ended by a burst of bolter fire and
cruel laughter.
%
Transmitted: Hunter Fleet Phaleg
Received: Tower of Angels
Destination: Grand Master Azrael
Intercept/Redirect: None, Inner Circle
members restricted
Date: 3677999M41
Telepathic Duct: Epistolary Kheros
Ref: FLN/30724592/IP
Author: Interrogator-Chaplain Phaleg

The tarot has guided me truthfully as always.
On Amistel, I captured three of the disciples
of a heretic calling himself the Voice of the
Emperor. They proved quite informative. They
received their orders on Lelithar where the cult
of the voice is the strongest. Their descriptions
of the Cult Magos conforms with Fallen one-
zero-zero. I urge you to bring the Tower of
Angels and all the might of our Chapter to
Agrapinna sector. One-zero-zero’s machinations
have destabilized the entire sector and
provoked a substantial response from the
Ecclesiarchy. Stealth will not serve. We will
need to fight our way through to him. That
he should be sighted so openly, so close to
the remains of Caliban in times such as
there demands urgency.

I believe that the Gate is about to be
stormed. Our final reckoning with the Fallen
is at hand.
%
Trooper Douro: Sir, I put a plasma gun
shot dead centre on the machine’s chest
and saw it go down. It didn’t make any
difference, they kept coming, no matter
how much fire we poured into them. I lost
count of how many shots I fired, but half
the time these things just got back up
again!

Colonel Montague: You are sure the weapons
were properly consecrated before the
engagements? The war spirits were honoured?

Trooper Douro: Yes, damn it, we- [Sergeant
Bullen administer physical correction for
use of inappropriate language before a
senior office] Yes… yes, the weapon
spirits were honoured.

Colonel Montague: The continue. What
happened next.

Trooper Douro: I saw Lukiz and Hucks
collapse, their skin and muscle stripped
from their bodies by these metal daemons’
weapons, it was horrible. The Chimera was
giving us some good fire support, but
even that could barely keep them at bay.
Our line was holding, just, but then I
saw a swarm of gleaming, beetle-like
things sweep over our heads and attach
themselves to the tank. Before we knew
what was happening they detonated and
blasted the Chimera’s turret clean off.
One of them must’ve hit the magazine… a
second later it blew sky high, taking two
of Red Company’s squads with it.

Colonel Montague: Did you see anything
other than the mechanical warriors and the
swarming machines that destroyed the
Chimera.

Trooper Douro: Uh… yes. Like I said, no
matter how hard we hit ’em, we, couldn’t
stop their advance, but we were still
putting a lot of ’em down. Then as I went
back to get more plasma cells for my gun,
I saw this weird black light, like a
miniature tornado suddenly appear behind
Blue Company’s heavy weapons platoon. I
shouted a warning, but it was too late.
More of these mechanical devils emerged
from that darkness and fired a volley of
shots into them. [Subject sobs
uncontrollably for several minutes until
disciplinary correction administered by
Sergeant Bullen] Sorry… then this
creature in crumbling robes and carrying a
staff that crackled with power was amongst
them and carved them up. I saw the
Captain cut in two and Commissar Vaughn
was ripped apart by this monster’s
bodyguard. The rest of the platoon broke
and ran, but I was quicker. I managed to
get to the bunker and, Emperor forgive
me, I locked the door and hid. I didn’t
come out for three days but, when I did,
there was nothing left.

Colonel Montague: You are a disgrace to
the regiment, Douro. You are scum of the
worst kind, a deserter and a coward and I
shall take great pleasure in watching your
execution. Take him away sergeant.

                 Excerpt from court-martial
            interrogation of Trooper Douro,
                XXIX Pyran Dragoons 999.M41
%
Upon the dead world of Cthelmax, our
Adeptus Mechanicus Explorator team
researched the ruins beneath the
fractured crust of this barren rock.
Several previous expeditions to this
planet had already been lost, but an
entire company of veteran soldiers and a
squad of Space Marines guarded this
expedition. Upon our arrival at the site
of the previous expedition, we were
astounded to find a battle underway
between a group of dark-armored
warriors and strange silver-skinned
constructs of gleaming metal. They
fought before a pipping gateway of
jade-veined darkness as a being with
skin of shimmering gold killed the
warriors with ease, each languorous blow
from its hand cutting a warrior down.

But I saw that, alone among the dark
warriors, a single figure darted through
the combat, fired twin pistols, and
evaded every blow. As the golden being
turned to face him, he slashed its torso
with a shining silver knife. No sooner
had the blade struck than it was
wrenched from his hand and swallowed
whole within the being’s golden flesh.
The sounds of battle continued, and a
dark veil dropped around the
combatants. When next I looked, there
was no sign that anything had occurred.
The area was completely empty.

Explorator Majoris Doreth [suppressed].M41
                    Cthelmax - Primus Site
%
Victory needs no explanation; defeat allows none.
%
We are at War with
forces too terrible to
comprehend. We
cannot afford mercy
for any of its victims
too weak to take the
morally correct
course. Mercy
destroys us, it
weakens us and saps
our resolve. Put
aside all such
thoughts. They are
not worthy of
Inquisitors in the
service of Our
Emperor. Praise his
Name, for in our
resolve we only
reflect his purpose of
will.

- The Book of Exorcisms, The
  Verses of Inquisitor Enoch
%
'We have crossed the Sea
of Stars in the name of the
Allfather and the Wolf-King.
These voyages were a time
for camaraderie, a time for
meditation, a time to prepare
for glories to come. But we are
at voyage’s end, my brothers,
and now shall our warrior
fury be unleashed.'
              -Brand Sabrewulf,
          Lord of Magnir’s Crag
%
‘We hold them here or we fight them on the hallowed ground
of Terra itself. I for one would rather see a million human
lives lost here than allow a single Ork to set foot on Earth.’

                     General Pavlov, Armageddon Command Guard.
%
“We only just made
it to the bunker.
Dozens of dead
hands scrabbled and
clawed at the view
ports the whole
night long. Then
Olex began to
cough…”

– Private Cur, currently
            quarantined.
%
“We shall give bloody praise to the
Lord of Pleasure and sing his name
as we dance across the fallen. Follow
me my children, and you shall taste
the undreamt joys that lie beyond the
bounds of mortal sense.”

   - Fabius Bile, Liutenant Commander
            of the Emperor’s Children
%
“We stand at a junction, with roads leading to both abject defeat and glorious victory. In order to choose the right
path to follow we need first to look back along the road that has led us to this point…”

                                                                                                   Commissar Yarrick
%
“We’re safe ’ere Gobbitz. There’s no way da beakies can get to us at the top of dis cliff…”

                                   Last words of Gibli the Gretchin before being overrun by
                                   Space Marine Assault troops from the Salamanders Chapter
%
“We’ve been ‘claiming’ this damned planet for the
Imperium all of my life, and all of my father and
grandfathers lives before that. I just wish someone
would get round to telling those damned Orks to get off
our damned land!”

                                                 – Anon
%
“We’ve got our Gargantz an’ we’ve got our weapons. Wot
ain’t we got? We ain’t got anyfing for target practice iz
wot! So I’ll tell you wot we’re gonna do. We’re gonna give
da Humies a taste of ‘ot metal death is wot. We’s gonna
take Big Gork and Big Mork ‘ere an’ we’s gonna stomp
Hummie!”

       Warlord Dragnatz prepares the Boyz for the Waaargh!
%
“Well, I never expected that to happen…”

              Last words of Colonel Einz
%
“What are these dirty little things doing here? Where are
our cities? Who has murdered the Children of Asuryan?!”

                                 Mauryon returns to Baran
%
What do I ask of my officers? Merely that they
do their duty with fire in their bellies and a prayer
on their lips.

                     Lord Castellan Ursarkar E. Creed
%
What I cannot crush with words I will crush with
the tanks of the Imperial Guard!

                  Lord Commander Solar Macharius
%
Who pledged his loyalty?
The Warmaster
Whom did we serve in faith?
The Warmaster
From whom did we take our name?
The Warmaster
Who was denied to us?
The Warmaster
But whom shall we remake?
The Warmaster
And who shall lead us to victory?
The Warmaster

         - Black Legion Catechism
%
“Why, if it isn’t Brother Marius. The injuries from the last
training exercise have healed well I see. And that new
bionic eye should prove most useful for this next
exercise. Tell me, how many hours have you had on Land
Speeders up to now?”

                                     Veteran Sergeant Kesser
%
WHY ORK BLOOD IS RED…

Segment CXVI: ork Physiology and pigmentation by Genetor-Major Anzion

TRANSMITTED: .............................BELIAL V
RECEIVED: ................................GYNDRA
DATE: ....................................3203997.M53
TELEPATHIC DUCT: .........................Astropath-terminus Holroyd
REF: .....................................Inq.XR.01044310/A.sub34
AUTHOR: ..................................GENETOR-MAJOR ANZION
THOUGHT FOR THE DAY: .....................MARTYR THYSELF

Many novitiates have queried me in the past as to why, given the symbiosis of
algal material in Ork DNA, their greenish pigmentation is apparent only in their
skin and not other parts of their anatomy such as blood plasma, inside the
mouth, internal organs, and so on. The answer to this is simple. Much like more
primitive plant forms, the green pigment of Orks is produced by photosynthesis
occurring in algae just beneath the skin, a phenomenon which does not affect
internal tissues. This means that an Ork’s blood, with its oxygen-rich
haemoglobin, is just as red as that of homo sapiens and often more so due to
its enhanced capacity for carrying oxygen.
%
With the thrice-damned renegades of lewd Slaanesh,
your well-tried techniques of forceful inquisition will
serve you ill. These voluptuaries and heretics that
debase themselves before their so-called Lord of Dark
Delights are not to be unburdened of their lisping
truths by subtle pressures or the keen probing of your
instruments. Conspiring against all decency even in
such matters, these libertines take pleasure from our
inquiries, debauching themselves with inhuman
dissolution upon the racks and wheels of Verity. For
these abominations, other methods are required…

                  - The Teachings of Inquisitor Magnus.
%
                                           XENO REPORT

Tyranid Lifeform 0104431/A/Sub34.1
Identification code name - LICTOR

                 <<<<<<<<<<<< By edict of the Ordo Xenos >>>>>>>>>>>>
		                         For distribution to:
Departmento Munitorum Imperial Guard command staff of Emeritar level clearance and above.
             Adeptus Arbites Precint houses, investigative and judicial courts.
          Planetary Defence Force commanders subject to governance audit 896.

TRANSMITTED:................................ Talasa Prime
RECEIVED:................................... Macragge
DESTINATION:................................ Kar Duniash
DATE:....................................... 3203993.M41
TELEPATHIC DUCT:............................ Astropath-terminus Halreisian
REF:........................................ Inq.XR.01044310/A.sub34
AUTHOR:..................................... Inquisitor Kryptman
THOUGHT FOR THE DAY:........................ See the alien, kill the alien.

The following briefing has been prepared to raise awareness
of the need for vigilance against the Tyranid ‘Lictor’
lifeform, in particular on frontier worlds of the Ultima
Segmentum. Recipients of this report are ordered to
disseminate its content in appropriate cultural fashion to
Imperial forces in their area of operation (Inquisition Order
HA/3210/44NK.00021234). The contents of this report may,
by necessity, need to be modified or in part omitted to
prevent Alien-panic or Xeno-shock responses. It is the full
responsibility of the recipients of this report to avoid
terminology and imagery which will induce fear, cowardice,
and anti-Imperial sentiments while disseminating its contents.
Individuals who betray their loyalty to the Emperor in this
matter will be subject to summary Inquisitorial punishment.

BEHAVIOURAL INDEX - STALKER/PREDATOR
Lictors are an infiltration/reconnaissance lifeform most
commonly dropped via Mycetic spore ahead of Tyranid main
force hive fleets. They are delivered by quasi-independent
seeker drones which jump ahead of the main fleet swarm, in
all probability to assess life bearing worlds and their
autochthonous inhabitants prior to the arrival of the hive ships
(typically a four to twelve weeks delay). The Lictors perform a
similar function to the seeker drones on the planet itself. They
rove ahead of the Tyranid ground swarms seeking out pockets
of enemy resistance and native lifeforms to be absorbed.

Lictors are often referred to by Imperial troops as Spooks or
Mantis Stalkers because of their unnerving behavioural patterns
and combat techniques. It is believed that stalking Lictors
exude a pheromone trail which draws other Tyranid creatures
in their wake and it is likely that a larger concentration of
prey stimulates a stronger pheromone response and brings a
larger group of trailing Tyranids. It is difficult to assess
whether all Tyranid attacks are preceded by Lictor activity as
their adaptations make them extremely difficult to detect.

However, where reports of Lictor activity have been filed they
are invariably followed by a Tyranid main force attack within
two to forty eight hours. With the approach of a ground
swarm, the Lictors revert to a predatory role and conduct
independent attacks on patrols and outposts. Hence there is a
strong likelihood that an overdue patrol or unresponsive
outpost will be due to Lictor attacks. Regular reporting and
sharp vigilance is strongly recommended in any area where
Tyranids are known to be active.

XENO TYPE - TYRANID WARRIOR GENUS
Lictors appear to be a stable mutation of the Tyranid Warrior
genus, heavily adapted for survival in hostile environments and
a stalker/predator role. They are intelligent and capable of
independent action. They possess highly developed sensory
organs which enable them to see, smell, hear and taste prey
long before it becomes aware of a Lictor’s presence.

Lictors are covered with tiny chamaleonic scales which shift
their colour and texture to match their surroundings. These
make Lictors exceedingly difficult to spot except at very close
ranges (typically one to three metres according to reports from
survivors of Lictor attacks). In close quarter combat, Lictors
revert to their normal colouration in accordance with their
‘parent’ hive fleet (information on hive fleet colouration is
detailed in the Alien Recognition Index Volumes XI to XIX).
A Lictor’s body gives off little heat and the creature is
apparently capable of remaining completely motionless for days
at a time, so even energy and motion surveyors are of little
use in divining their presence.

COMBAT ABILITIES
Lictors are highly evolved for dealing death with a whole
arsenal of bio-weaponry. These include mantis-like upper claws,
envenomed lower talons, feeder tentacles and barbed flesh
hooks. The powerful upper claws form their primary weapons
and are edged with a fractal chitin compound. A Lictor’s upper
claws have been noted as being capable of penetrating up to
80mm of Armaplas and shattering up to twentyfold ceramite
sheathing. The lower talons are used for ‘silent kills’ on life
forms and include venom channels containing a deadly
haemotoxin.

The Lictors’ feeder tentacles are tipped with sharp, bony plates
which are used to lobotomize immobilised victims. The Lictor
will then use the most foul of its abilities, the omophaegic
practice of directly absorbing a victim genetic data and
immediate memories by consuming their brains.

The flesh hooks are the most unusual of the Lictor’s weapons.
They are formed out of carbon-based chitin with a
monomolecular edge and attached to lengths of tough muscle
fibre situated between the ribs. The hooks are fired by a sharp
intercostal muscle spasm, allowing Lictors to snare their victims
from distance. The flesh hooks are also sometimes used as
grapnels which allow Lictors to scale vertical surfaces at speed.

CONCLUSION
The Lictor xeno-type has undergone few observable adaptations
since it first appeared in the Imperium. The earliest autopsies
of Lictors from Hive Fleet Behemoth at the Battle of
Macragge are entirely consistent with those from Hive Fleet
Kraken on Ichar IV. This indicates that the Lictor is a well
adapted to its function as can be, unlike the more fluid,
unfixed xeno-types which appear to undergo almost continuous
gene-splicing and forced evolution as the Tyranids attempt to
‘grow’ extra advantages for their predatory conquest.

It is imperative that Lictor activity is looked for and where
found it should be vigorously suppressed. Concealment and
undergrowth should be cleared for a distance around
strongpoints and fortifications. Active patrols must be used to
sweep wilderness areas, with pre-planned routes and regular
report times organised so that casualties can be quickly located.
Alert drills must be practised so that garrisons can be
promptly organised for the Tyranid main force arrival.
Deathworld veteran troops should be employed to meet the
threat of Lictors wherever possible, as their natural fieldcraft
and hunting abilities are likely to succeed where orbital
surveyors and other devices fail.

Inquisitor Kryptman
%
You may say he doesn’t exist, but I
know better. When I was crewing on
an ore freighter back in '73, we were
laid up on Dagohma making repairs.
That was the time the mining
Guilders sent in their hired guns to
clear the colonists from the Shantos
Hills. The colonists were all for
packing up and leaving until Cypher
arrived, but his prowess and his words
gave them courage. Before long, the
Guilder compound was under siege.
He didn’t stay till the end, but by
then, there was no stopping the
colonists. They stormed the compound
and hanged the Guilders from their
strip-mining rigs. No one else could
have done what he did - so what if
he didn’t tell anyone his name? When
the Space Marines Angels of Death
arrived weeks later, he was all they
were interested in, but no one told
them anything, even when they were
declared rebels and the trials began.
No one forgot what he had done for
them. They died proud and free.

                         Arsann Crowe,
                recidivist and Heretic
%
You must face the truth squarely and without flinching from duty.
Our Enemies are mortal no longer. Mercy for such as they is a
chimera, self-deception is its only ally. Dedicate this weapon, given
unto your hand at the behest of the Emperor, to their destruction.
Regard its function as your only duty: you live only to bring cleansing
fire. Take up your rod and staff, your armour and psycannon, and
go forth.

              - Lectures to the Ordo, Inquisitor Historical Galbus Heer
%